Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE A. COURTS

CHAPTER 24. DISTRICT COURTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 24.001. AGE QUALIFICATION OF JUDGES. A district judge must be at least 25 years old.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.002. ASSIGNMENT OF JUDGE OR TRANSFER OF CASE ON RECUSAL. If a district judge determines on the judge's own motion that the judge should not sit in a case pending in the judge's court because the judge is disqualified or otherwise should recuse himself or herself, the judge shall enter a recusal order, request the presiding judge of that administrative judicial region to assign another judge to sit, and take no further action in the case except for good cause stated in the order in which the action is taken. A change of venue is not necessary because of the disqualification of a district judge in a case or proceeding pending in the judge's court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.01, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.003. TRANSFER OF CASES; EXCHANGE OF BENCHES. (a) This section applies only to counties with two or more district courts.

(b) Unless provided otherwise by the local rules of administration, a district judge in the county may:

(1) except as provided by Subsection (b-1), transfer any civil or criminal case or proceeding on the court's docket, other than a case governed by Chapter 155, Family Code, to the docket of another district court in the county;

(2) hear and determine any case or proceeding pending in another district court in the county without having the case transferred;

(3) sit for another district court in the county and hear and determine any case or proceeding pending in that court;

(4) temporarily exchange benches with the judge of another district court in the county;

(5) try different cases in the same court at the same time; and

(6) occupy the judge's own courtroom or the courtroom of another district court in the county.

(b-1) Notwithstanding the local rules of administration, a district judge may not transfer any civil or criminal case or proceeding to the docket of another district court without the consent of the judge of the court to which it is transferred.

(c) If a district judge in the county is sick or otherwise absent, another district judge in the county may hold court for the judge.

(d) A district judge in the county may hear and determine any part or question of any case or proceeding pending in any of the district courts, and any other district judge may complete the hearing and render judgment in the case or proceeding. A district judge may hear and determine motions, including motions for new trial, petitions for injunction, applications for the appointment of a receiver, interventions, pleas in abatement, dilatory pleas, and all preliminary matters, questions, and proceedings, and may enter judgment or order on them in the court in which the case or proceeding is pending without transferring the case or proceeding. The district judge in whose court the matter is pending may proceed to hear, complete, and determine the matter, or all or any part of another matter, and render a final judgment. A district judge may issue a restraining order or injunction that is returnable to any other district court.

(e) A judgment or order shall be entered in the minutes of the court in which the case is pending.

(f) This section does not limit the powers of a district judge when acting for another judge by exchange of benches or otherwise.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.02, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 962 (H.B. 1875), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 24.004. SPECIAL JUDGE BY AGREEMENT OF PARTIES. If the parties agree on a special judge for the trial of a particular case, the clerk shall enter in the minutes of the court, as a part of the proceedings in the case, a record showing:

(1) that the judge of the court is disqualified to try the case;

(2) the name of the special judge and that the parties agreed on the selection of that judge for the trial of the case; and

(3) that the oath prescribed by law was administered to the special judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.006. SALARY OF SPECIAL JUDGE. (a) This section applies to payment of salary to:

(1) a special judge commissioned by the governor as provided by Article V, Section 11, of the Texas Constitution; and

(2) a special judge agreed on by the parties as provided by Section 24.004.

(b) Each special judge is entitled to receive for each day served as a special judge the same daily salary that a district judge receives.

(c) A special judge commissioned by the governor is also entitled to receive the same daily salary that a district judge receives for each day necessary for the special judge to travel to and from the court.

(d) The daily salary is determined by dividing the annual salary of a district judge by 365.

(e) In order to obtain his salary, a special judge commissioned by the governor must present his sworn account to the comptroller showing the number of travel days that were necessary. The judge must also give the comptroller evidence that the judge was duly commissioned. The account must be certified as correct by the judge of the district or by the court clerk of the court in which he served.

(f) A special judge agreed on by the parties or elected by the practicing lawyers shall be paid on presenting to the comptroller the certificate of the clerk of the court in which he served and the judge's sworn account. The clerk's certificate must show the record of the judge's election or appointment and must show that the judge performed services in the court. The judge's sworn account must show the number of days that he served as the special judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 24.007. JURISDICTION. (a) The district court has the jurisdiction provided by Article V, Section 8, of the Texas Constitution.

(b) A district court has original jurisdiction of a civil matter in which the amount in controversy is more than $500, exclusive of interest.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.36, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.02, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.008. OTHER JURISDICTION. The district court may hear and determine any cause that is cognizable by courts of law or equity and may grant any relief that could be granted by either courts of law or equity.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.009. JURISDICTIONAL AMOUNT IF PARTIES PROPERLY JOIN IN ONE SUIT. If two or more persons originally and properly join in one suit, the suit for jurisdictional purposes is treated as if one party is suing for the aggregate amount of all their claims added together, excluding interest and costs. This section does not prevent jurisdiction from attaching on any other ground.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.010. JURISDICTION OF FAILURE TO PAY OVER CERTAIN MONEY. The district court may hear and determine:

(1) motions against sheriffs and other officers of the court for failure to pay over money collected under the process of the court or other defalcation of duty in connection with the process; and

(2) motions against attorneys for money collected by them and not paid over.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.011. WRIT POWER. A judge of a district court may, either in termtime or vacation, grant writs of mandamus, injunction, sequestration, attachment, garnishment, certiorari, and supersedeas and all other writs necessary to the enforcement of the court's jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.012. TERMS AND SESSIONS OF COURT. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (a-1) and (a-2) and Section 24.0125, notwithstanding any other law, each district court holds in each county in the judicial district terms that commence on the first Mondays in January and July of each year. To the extent of a conflict between this subsection and a specific provision relating to a particular judicial district, this section controls.

(a-1) The term of the 47th District Court in Armstrong County begins on the first Monday in January.

(a-2) In Harris County each district court holds terms that commence on the first Mondays in February, May, August, and November of each year.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the terms of each district, family district, and criminal district court are continuous. Each term begins on a day fixed by law and continues until the day fixed by law for the beginning of the next succeeding term.

(c) The commencement of a term of court is not affected by the fact that the first day of the term falls on a legal holiday or the judge is absent from the county on the first day of the term.

(d) A district judge may hold as many sessions of court in a county as he considers proper and expedient for the dispatch of business and may adopt rules for that purpose as authorized by the statutes of this state and the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure.

(e) A district judge may hear a nonjury matter relating to a civil or criminal case at a correctional facility in the county in which the case is filed or prosecuted if a party to the case or the criminal defendant is confined in the correctional facility. For purposes of this subsection, "correctional facility" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.07, Penal Code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1494, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.03, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081 (H.B. 3378), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 2, eff. June 7, 2019.

Sec. 24.0125. TERMS AND SESSIONS OF COURT FOLLOWING CERTAIN DISASTERS. Notwithstanding any other law, if a disaster, as defined by Section 418.004, precludes a district court from holding its judicial district terms in accordance with Section 24.012, the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region, with the approval of the judge of the affected district court, may designate the terms and sessions of court.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 3, eff. June 7, 2019.

Sec. 24.014. SPECIAL TERMS. (a) A district judge may set a time for and hold a special term in any county in his district.

(b) The judge may impanel grand and petit jurors as provided by law. The jurors may be summoned to appear before the court at the time designated by the judge.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 , Sec. 21(2), eff. September 1, 2015.

(d) A new civil case may not be brought to a special term of the court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 2150), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 2150), Sec. 21(2), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.015. PROCEDURE AT SPECIAL TERM. (a) Juries for special terms authorized by Section 24.014 shall be summoned in the manner provided by law for regular terms.

(b) Any proceeding in a case that may be held at a regular term may also be held at a special term.

(c) The following procedures in any civil or criminal case are the same and have the same force and effect when done at a special term as though done at a regular term:

(1) the issuance of process, whether to a regular term or a special term;

(2) the conduct of proceedings;

(3) the issuance of an order, judgment, or decree; and

(4) an appeal.

(d) A proceeding held at a special term may be appealed as if it were held at a regular term.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.016. APPOINTED COUNSEL. A district judge may appoint counsel to attend to the cause of a party who makes an affidavit that he is too poor to employ counsel to attend to the cause.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.017. PROCEEDINGS IN MULTICOUNTY DISTRICTS. (a) This section applies in judicial districts that are composed of more than one county.

(b) Except as provided by this section, the judge of a district court may, in any county in his judicial district:

(1) hear and determine all preliminary and interlocutory matters in which a jury may not be demanded;

(2) hear and determine uncontested or agreed cases and contests of elections pending in his district, unless a party to the suit objects; and

(3) sign all necessary orders and judgments in those matters.

(c) The judge may sign an order or decree in any case pending for trial or on trial before him in any county in his district at a place that is convenient to the judge and forward the order or decree to the clerk for filing and entry.

(d) A district judge who is assigned to preside in a court of another judicial district or is presiding in exchange or at the request of the regular judge of the court may, in the manner provided by this section for the regular judge, hear, determine, and enter the orders, judgments, and decrees in a case that is pending for trial or has been tried before the visiting judge.

(e) All contested divorce cases, all default judgments, and all cases in which any of the parties are cited by publication must be tried in the county in which the case is filed unless other law authorizes the case to be tried in another county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.018. CERTAIN EFFECT OF DISTRICT REORGANIZATION. If the counties that compose a judicial district or the time or place for holding terms of a district court are changed by law:

(1) the process and writs issued from the district court and made returnable to a term of court fixed by the law at the time of the issuance are returnable to the next term of the court as fixed by the amended law and are as legal and valid as if they were made returnable to the term of the court as fixed by the amended law;

(2) the grand and petit jurors selected or drawn under the prior law in any county in the judicial district are lawfully selected or drawn for the next term of the district court of the county as fixed by the amended law; and

(3) the obligees in all appearance bonds and recognizances taken in and for the district court and the witnesses summoned to appear before the district court under the prior law are required to appear at the next term of the court as fixed by the amended law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.019. EXPENSES OF DISTRICT JUDGE. (a) A district judge engaged in the discharge of official duties in a county other than the judge's county of residence is entitled to traveling and other necessary expenses, as provided by Chapter 660.

(b) A district judge is entitled to receive from the state the actual and necessary postage, telegraph, and telephone expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties.

(c) The expenses shall be paid by the state on a sworn itemized account showing the expenses.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(105), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 24.020. JURISDICTION OVER COMMISSIONERS COURT. The district court has appellate jurisdiction and general supervisory control over the commissioners court, with the exceptions and regulations prescribed by law.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.37, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.021. INCOMPETENCY. For purposes of Article XV, Section 6, of the Texas Constitution, "incompetency" means:

(1) gross ignorance of official duties;

(2) gross carelessness in the discharge of official duties; or

(3) inability or unfitness to promptly and properly discharge official duties because of a serious mental or physical defect that did not exist at the time of the judge's election.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.022. EFFECT OF TRANSFER OF CERTAIN CASES FOLLOWING CREATION OF ADDITIONAL COURT. (a) On the creation of an additional district court in a county, an existing district court in the county may transfer to the new court a case regarding a child who is subject to the continuing exclusive jurisdiction of the existing court under Title 5, Family Code, regardless of whether the case is pending in the existing court or the existing court rendered a final order in the case.

(b) The district court to which the case is transferred under this section acquires continuing exclusive jurisdiction under Title 5, Family Code, over the child.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1148, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2001.

Sec. 24.023. OBLIGATIONS; BONDS. (a) When a case is transferred from one court to another, all processes, writs, bonds, recognizances, and other obligations issued by the transferring court are returnable to the court to which the case is transferred as if originally issued by that court.

(b) The obligees in all bonds and recognizances taken in and for a court from which a case is transferred, and all witnesses summoned to appear in a district court from which a case is transferred, are required to appear before the court to which the case is transferred as if the bond, recognizance, or summons was taken in or for that court.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.024. FILING AND DOCKETING CASES. In a county with two or more district courts, the district judges may adopt rules governing the filing and numbering of cases, the assignment of cases for trial, and the distribution of the work of the courts as in their discretion they consider necessary or desirable for the orderly dispatch of the business of the courts.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.025. SUPPLEMENTAL COMPENSATION. (a) Unless otherwise provided by this subchapter, all district judges in a county are entitled to equal amounts of supplemental compensation from the county.

(b) A district judge is entitled to an amount of supplemental compensation for serving on the juvenile board of a county that is equal to the amount other judges serving on the juvenile board receive.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.026. APPOINTMENT OF INITIAL JUDGE. On the creation of a new judicial district, the initial vacancy in the office of district judge is filled in accordance with Section 28, Article V, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.027. GRAND AND PETIT JURORS. All grand and petit jurors selected in a county before a new district court is created or the composition of an existing district court is modified by an amendment to this chapter are considered to be selected for the new or modified district court, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.028. CASES TRANSFERRED. If by an amendment to this chapter a county is removed from the composition of an existing judicial district and added to another existing or new judicial district, all cases and proceedings from that county that are pending in the district court of the judicial district from which the county was removed are transferred to the district court of the judicial district to which the county is added. The judge of each affected district court shall sign the proper orders in connection with the transfer.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.029. PROCESSES, WRITS, AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS REMAIN VALID. (a) If by an amendment to this chapter a county is removed from the composition of an existing judicial district and added to another existing or new judicial district, or if an amendment to this chapter changes the time or place at which the terms of court are held, all processes, writs, bonds, recognizances, and other obligations issued from and made returnable to that court before the effective date of the transfer or other change are returnable as provided by this subsection. An obligation issued from the affected court is returnable to another district court in the county on the date that court directs, but may not be made returnable on a date that is earlier than the date on which the obligation was originally returnable. The obligations are legal and valid as if the obligations had been made returnable to the issuing court.

(b) The obligees in all appearance bonds and recognizances taken in and for a district court of a county before the effective date of an amendment to this chapter, and all witnesses summoned to appear before that district court under laws existing before the effective date of an amendment to this chapter, are required to appear at another district court in the county on the date that court directs, but may not be required to appear on a date that is earlier than the date on which the obligees or witnesses were originally required to appear.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.030. LOCATION OF COURT. (a) A district court shall sit in the county seat for a jury trial in a civil case. The commissioners court of the county may authorize a district court to sit in any municipality within the county to hear and determine nonjury trials in civil cases and to hear and determine motions, arguments, and other matters not heard before a jury in a civil case that is within the court's jurisdiction.

(b) The district clerk or the clerk's deputy serves as clerk of the court when a court sits in a municipality other than the municipality that is the county seat and may transfer:

(1) all necessary books, minutes, records, and papers to that municipality while the court is in session there; and

(2) the books, minutes, records, and papers back to the clerk's office in the county seat at the end of each session.

(c) If the commissioners court authorizes a district court to sit in a municipality other than the municipality that is the county seat, the commissioners court shall provide suitable facilities for the court in that municipality.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.031. COURT OFFICERS. The prosecuting attorney, the sheriff, the district clerk, the bailiffs, and the other officers serving the other district courts of the county shall serve in their respective capacities for the courts listed in this chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.04, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.033. LOCATION OF PROCEEDINGS FOLLOWING CERTAIN DISASTERS. (a) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 17, eff. June 7, 2019.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, if a disaster, as defined by Section 418.004, precludes a district court from conducting its proceedings at the county seat of that county, the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region, with the approval of the judge of the affected district court, may designate for the proceedings an alternate location:

(1) in the judicial district of the affected court; or

(2) outside the judicial district at the location the presiding judge determines is closest in proximity to the county seat that allows the court to safely and practicably conduct its proceedings, provided the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region for the designated location approves if that presiding judge is not the presiding judge making the designation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1076 (H.B. 2766), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 4, eff. June 7, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 17, eff. June 7, 2019.

Sec. 24.034. ASSIGNMENT OF CASES IN DISTRICT COURTS IN HIDALGO COUNTY. (a) All civil and criminal cases in the district courts in Hidalgo County shall be assigned and docketed at random by the district clerk using an automated system.

(b) In assigning a case to a district court, the district clerk shall take into consideration any requirement in Subchapter B that a district court in Hidalgo County give preference to specific matters.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. CERTAIN JUDICIAL DISTRICTS

Sec. 24.101. 1ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JASPER, NEWTON, SABINE, AND SAN AUGUSTINE COUNTIES). (a) The 1st Judicial District is composed of Jasper, Newton, Sabine, and San Augustine counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 1st District Court in Sabine and San Augustine counties has the civil jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 1st District Court begin:

(1) in Jasper County on the first Monday in January and the 22nd Monday after the first Monday in January;

(2) in Newton County on the 5th and 34th Mondays after the first Monday in January;

(3) in San Augustine County on the 11th and 40th Mondays after the first Monday in January; and

(4) in Sabine County on the 17th and 45th Mondays after the first Monday in January.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.102. 2ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CHEROKEE COUNTY). (a) The 2nd Judicial District is composed of Cherokee County.

(b) The terms of the 2nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in March and September.

(c) The judge may take a vacation and not attend court for four weeks in each year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.103. 3RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ANDERSON, HENDERSON, AND HOUSTON COUNTIES). (a) The 3rd Judicial District is composed of Anderson, Henderson, and Houston counties.

(b) The terms of the 3rd District Court begin:

(1) in Anderson County on the first Mondays in April, July, and December;

(2) in Henderson County on the first Mondays in February, June, and September; and

(3) in Houston County on the first Mondays in March, August, and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.104. 4TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (RUSK COUNTY). (a) The 4th Judicial District is composed of Rusk County.

(b) The terms of the 4th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.105. 5TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BOWIE AND CASS COUNTIES). (a) The 5th Judicial District is composed of Bowie and Cass counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Bowie and Cass counties has the civil and criminal jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) In Bowie County, the 5th Judicial District has concurrent jurisdiction with the 102nd Judicial District. Either court, in term or in vacation, may transfer a pending civil or criminal case to the other court by an order entered on the minutes of the transferring court.

(d) The terms of the 5th District Court begin:

(1) in Bowie County on the first Mondays in January and July; and

(2) in Cass County on the first Mondays in February, May, August, and November.

(e) The 5th and 102nd district courts may sit in Bowie County in Texarkana, in addition to Boston, to try, hear, and determine nonjury civil or criminal cases, motions, arguments, and other nonjury matters.

(f) When the courts sit in Texarkana, the Bowie County district clerk or the clerk's deputy shall serve as clerk of the courts and may transfer all necessary books, minutes, and records to Texarkana or Boston when necessary. The Bowie County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the courts in Texarkana and perform all duties required by law or by the court.

(g) The Commissioners Court of Bowie County may provide suitable quarters for the 5th and 102nd district courts in Texarkana or may make an agreement with the City of Texarkana to provide quarters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1012, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.106. 6TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT ( LAMAR AND RED RIVER COUNTIES). (a) The 6th Judicial District is composed of Lamar and Red River counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Red River County has the civil and criminal jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) In Red River County, the 6th Judicial District has concurrent jurisdiction with the 102nd Judicial District. In Lamar County, the 6th Judicial District has concurrent jurisdiction with the 62nd Judicial District.

(d) In any county in the district in which there are two or more district courts, the judges of those courts may, in their discretion, either in termtime or in vacation, on motion of any party, on agreement of the parties, or on their own motion, transfer any civil or criminal case or proceeding on their dockets to the docket of one of the other district courts. In Lamar County, the judges may transfer a case by an order entered in the minutes of the transferring court. The judges of the courts may, in their discretion, exchange benches or districts from time to time. Any of the judges may in his own courtroom try and determine any case or proceeding pending in any of the other courts without having the case transferred or may sit in any of the other courts and hear and determine any case or proceeding pending in one of those courts. Two or more judges may try different cases in the same court at the same time and each may occupy his own courtroom or the room of any other court. In case of absence, sickness, or disqualification of any of the judges, any other of the judges may hold court for him. Any of the judges may hear and determine any part or question of any case or proceeding pending in any of the courts, and any other of the judges may complete the hearing and render judgment in the proceeding. Any of the judges may hear and determine motions, petitions for injunction, applications for appointment of receivers, interventions, motions to transfer venue, pleas in abatement and all dilatory pleas, motions for new trials, and all preliminary matters, questions, and proceedings, and may enter judgment or order on them in the court in which the case or proceeding is pending without having the matter transferred to the court of the acting judge. The judge in whose court the matter is pending may proceed to hear, complete, and determine the matter or all or any part of any other matter and may render final judgment on it. Any of the judges of the courts may issue restraining orders and injunctions returnable to any of the other courts. This subsection does not limit the powers of the judges when acting for any other judge by exchange of benches or otherwise.

(e) The terms of the 6th District Court in each county in the district begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 1(c), eff. January 1, 2010.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 1(d), eff. January 1, 2010.

Sec. 24.107. 7TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (SMITH COUNTY). (a) The 7th Judicial District is composed of Smith County.

(b) The terms of the 7th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.108. 8TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DELTA, FRANKLIN, HOPKINS, AND RAINS COUNTIES). (a) The 8th Judicial District is composed of Delta, Franklin, Hopkins, and Rains counties.

(b) In any county in the district in which there are two or more district courts, those district courts have concurrent jurisdiction in that county.

(c) In any county in the district in which there are two or more district courts, the judges of those courts may, in their discretion, either in termtime or in vacation, on motion of any party, on agreement of the parties, or on their own motion, transfer any civil or criminal case or proceeding on their dockets to the docket of one of the other district courts. The judges in Delta and Franklin counties may transfer a case by an order entered on the minutes of the transferring court. The judges of the courts may, in their discretion, exchange benches or districts from time to time. If a judge of one of the courts is disqualified, he may transfer the case or proceeding from his court to one of the other courts. Any of the judges may in his own courtroom try and determine any case or proceeding pending in any of the other courts without having the case transferred or may sit in any of the other courts and hear and determine any case or proceeding pending in one of those courts. Two or more judges may try different cases in the same court at the same time and each may occupy his own courtroom or the room of any other court. In case of absence, sickness, or disqualification of any of the judges, any other of the judges may hold court for him. Any of the judges may hear and determine any part or question of any case or proceeding pending in any of the courts, and any other of the judges may complete the hearing and render judgment in the proceeding. Any of the judges may hear and determine motions, petitions for injunction, applications for appointment of receivers, interventions, motions to transfer venue, pleas in abatement and all dilatory pleas, motions for new trials, and all preliminary matters, questions, and proceedings, and may enter judgment or order on them in the court in which the case or proceeding is pending without having the matter transferred to the court of the acting judge. The judge in whose court the matter is pending may proceed to hear, complete, and determine the matter or all or any part of any other matter and may render final judgment on it. Any of the judges of the courts may issue restraining orders and injunctions returnable to any of the other courts. This subsection does not limit the powers of the judges when acting for any other judge by exchange of benches or otherwise.

(d) The terms of the 8th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.109. 9TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). (a) The 9th Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County.

(b) The terms of the 9th District Court begin on the first Monday in January and the first Monday in July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1308, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 9(b), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.110. 410TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). (a) The 410th Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County.

(b) The terms of the 410th District Court begin on the first Monday in January and the first Monday in July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 657 (H.B. 3199), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.111. 10TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GALVESTON COUNTY). (a) The 10th Judicial District is composed of Galveston County.

(b) The terms of the 10th and 56th district courts begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) In all suits, actions, or proceedings in the district courts in Galveston County, it is sufficient for the address or designation to be the "District Court of Galveston County."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.112. 11TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 11th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (g), the provisions of this section apply to the 11th, 55th, 61st, 80th, 113th, 125th, 127th, 129th, 133rd, 151st, 152nd, 157th, 164th, and 165th judicial districts.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

(d) In all suits, actions, or proceedings in the district courts, it is sufficient for the address or designation to be "District Court of Harris County."

(e) The judge of each district court shall sign the minutes of each court term not later than the 30th day after the end of the term and shall also sign the minutes at the end of each volume of the minutes. Each judge sitting in the court shall sign the minutes of the proceedings that were held before him.

(f) The judge of each district court may take the same vacation as the other district court judges of Harris County at any time during the year. During the judge's vacation, the court term remains open, and the judge of any other district court may hold court during the judge's vacation. The judges of the district courts shall, by agreement among themselves, take their vacations alternately so that there are at all times at least six district court judges in the county.

(g) Subsection (h) applies to the 11th, 55th, 61st, 80th, 113th, 125th, 127th, 129th, 133rd, 151st, 152nd, 157th, 164th, 165th, 189th, 190th, 215th, 234th, 269th, 270th, 280th, 281st, 295th, 333rd, and 334th judicial districts.

(h) The judges of the district courts listed in Subsection (g) by agreement shall designate one of the listed district courts as the domestic violence district court for Harris County. In designating the domestic violence district court, the judges shall give preference to a district court:

(1) that has a judicial vacancy at the time of the agreement; or

(2) for which the sitting judge of the district court has not at the time of the agreement announced a candidacy or become a candidate in the upcoming election for that judicial office.

(i) Subject to any jurisdictional limitations, the district court designated under Subsection (h) as the domestic violence district court shall give preference to domestic violence cases, including cases involving:

(1) dating violence, as defined by Section 71.0021, Family Code; and

(2) family violence, as defined by Section 71.004, Family Code.

(j) For the purposes of determining the preference the designated domestic violence district court is required to give cases under Subsection (i):

(1) a domestic violence case means:

(A) an original application for a protective order under Title 4, Family Code;

(B) an original application for a protective order under Title 4, Family Code, that involves both parties and is filed concurrently with an original petition under the Family Code; and

(C) any matter involving custody of a minor child if one parent is alleged to have caused the death of another parent and there is a history of domestic violence in the parents' relationship; and

(2) subject to judicial discretion and resources, the designated domestic violence district court may also hear divorce and custody cases in which:

(A) a court has made an affirmative finding of family violence involving both parties; or

(B) a protective order has been issued under Title 4, Family Code, involving both parties.

(k) The designated domestic violence district court shall:

(1) provide timely and efficient access to emergency protective orders and other court remedies for persons the court determines are victims of domestic violence;

(2) integrate victims' services for persons the court determines are victims of domestic violence who have a case before the court; and

(3) promote an informed and consistent court response to domestic violence cases to lessen the number of misdemeanors, felonies, and fatalities related to domestic violence in Harris County.

(l) The Harris County district clerk shall create a form and establish procedures to transfer a domestic violence case that qualifies for preference under this section to the domestic violence district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 572 (S.B. 2217), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.113. 12TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GRIMES, MADISON, AND WALKER COUNTIES). The 12th Judicial District is composed of Grimes, Madison, and Walker counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.01(a), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 24.114. 13TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NAVARRO COUNTY). (a) The 13th Judicial District is composed of Navarro County.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Navarro County has the civil jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 13th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) The judge of the 13th District Court shall impanel grand juries at the April and October terms and at any other terms as ordered by the judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.115. 14TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 14th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 14th District Court begin on the second Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Except for Subsection (b), which applies only to the 14th District Court, this section applies to the 14th, 44th, 68th, 95th, 101st, 116th, 134th, 160th, and 162nd district courts, the Criminal Judicial District of Dallas County, and the Criminal Judicial Districts Nos. 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of Dallas County.

(d) The district courts and criminal district courts having jurisdiction in Dallas County have concurrent jurisdiction.

(e) The judges of the district and criminal district courts of Dallas County shall, by agreement among themselves, take vacations so that there are at all times at least three judges of those courts in the county.

(f) Repealed by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

(g) The Dallas County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the courts when required by law or by the judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.44(2), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 13(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.116. 15TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GRAYSON COUNTY). (a) The 15th Judicial District is composed of Grayson County.

(b) The 15th and 59th judicial districts have concurrent jurisdiction in Grayson County.

(c) The terms of the 15th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 610 (H.B. 2174), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.117. 16TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). (a) The 16th Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

(b) The terms of the 16th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July of each year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 649, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989.

Sec. 24.118. 17TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 17th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 17th, 48th, 67th, 96th, and 153rd district courts have concurrent jurisdiction in Tarrant County.

(c) The terms of the 17th and 96th district courts begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) The 17th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 2454), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 24.119. 18TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JOHNSON AND SOMERVELL COUNTIES). (a) The 18th Judicial District is composed of Johnson and Somervell counties.

(b) The terms of the 18th District Court in each county in the district begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.27(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.120. 19TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MCLENNAN COUNTY). (a) The 19th Judicial District is composed of McLennan County.

(b) The 19th, 54th, 74th, 170th, 414th, and 474th district courts have concurrent jurisdiction in McLennan County.

(b-1) The 19th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county court and the statutory county courts of McLennan County in misdemeanor cases as well as the jurisdiction prescribed by general law for district courts.

(c) The terms of the 19th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, March, May, July, September, and November.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 2230), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.08(a), eff. October 1, 2022.

Sec. 24.121. 20TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MILAM COUNTY). (a) The 20th Judicial District is composed of Milam County.

(b) The terms of the 20th District Court begin on the third Mondays in January, May, and September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.122. 21ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BASTROP, BURLESON, LEE, AND WASHINGTON COUNTIES). (a) The 21st Judicial District is composed of Bastrop, Burleson, Lee, and Washington counties.

(b) The terms of the 21st District Court begin:

(1) in Bastrop County on the second Tuesday in January and the 15th Tuesday after the first Tuesday in March;

(2) in Burleson County on the 10th Tuesdays after the first Tuesdays in March and September;

(3) in Lee County on the sixth Tuesdays after the first Tuesdays in March and September; and

(4) in Washington County on the first Tuesdays in March and September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.123. 22ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CALDWELL, COMAL, AND HAYS COUNTIES). (a) The 22nd Judicial District is composed of Caldwell, Comal, and Hays counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Comal County has the civil and criminal jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 22nd District Court begin:

(1) in Caldwell County on the first Mondays in March, June, September, and December;

(2) in Comal County on the first Mondays in April, July, October, and January; and

(3) in Hays County on the first Mondays in February, May, August, and November.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.124. 23RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MATAGORDA AND WHARTON COUNTIES). (a) The 23rd Judicial District is composed of Matagorda and Wharton counties.

(b) The terms of the 23rd District Court begin:

(1) in Matagorda County on the first Mondays in June and December, and the terms are designated the June-November and December-May terms; and

(2) in Wharton County on the first Mondays in July and January, and the terms are designated the July-December and January-June terms.

(c) There is one general docket for the 23rd and 130th district courts in Matagorda County. All suits and proceedings within the jurisdiction of the courts in Matagorda County shall be addressed to the district court of Matagorda County. All citations, notices, restraining orders, and other process issued in Matagorda County by the clerk or judges of the courts are returnable to the district court of Matagorda County without reference to the court number. On return of the process the judge of either court may preside over the hearing or trial. The judges of the 23rd and 130th district courts in Matagorda County may hear and dispose of any matter on the courts' general docket without transferring the matter.

(d) The Matagorda County district clerk shall keep one set of minutes in which the clerk shall record all judgments and orders of the 23rd and 130th district courts in Matagorda County. Each of the judges of the 23rd and 130th district courts in Matagorda County shall sign the minutes of each term of those courts not later than the 30th day after the end of each term, shall sign the minutes at the end of each column of the minutes, and shall sign the minutes of the proceedings that were held before him.

(e) Each of the judges of the 23rd and 130th district courts may take a vacation and not attend court for six weeks in each year. The judges by agreement between themselves shall take their vacations alternately so that there are at all times at least one judge in his judicial district.

(f) There is one general docket for the 23rd and 329th district courts in Wharton County. All suits and proceedings within the jurisdiction of the courts in Wharton County shall be addressed to the district court of Wharton County. All citations, notices, restraining orders, and other process issued in Wharton County by the clerk or judges of the courts are returnable to the district court of Wharton County without reference to the court number. On return of the process the judge of either court may preside over the hearing or trial. The judges of the 23rd and 329th district courts in Wharton County may hear and dispose of any matter on the courts' general docket, both civil and criminal, without transferring the matter.

(g) The Wharton County district clerk shall keep one set of minutes in which the clerk shall record all judgments and orders of the 23rd and 329th district courts in Wharton County. Each of the judges of the 23rd and 329th district courts in Wharton County shall sign the minutes of each term of those courts not later than the 30th day after the end of each term, shall sign the minutes at the end of each column of the minutes, and shall sign the minutes of the proceedings that were held before him.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 196, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.02(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.02(b), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.125. 24TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CALHOUN, DEWITT, GOLIAD, JACKSON, REFUGIO, AND VICTORIA COUNTIES). (a) The 24th Judicial District is composed of Calhoun, DeWitt, Goliad, Jackson, Refugio, and Victoria counties.

(b) The terms of the 24th District Court begin:

(1) in Calhoun County on the fourth Mondays in April and October;

(2) in DeWitt County on the second Mondays in January and July;

(3) in Goliad County on the first Mondays in February and August;

(4) in Jackson County on the fourth Mondays in January and July;

(5) in Refugio County on the third Mondays in April and October; and

(6) in Victoria County on the second Mondays in March and September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.126. 25TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLORADO, GONZALES, GUADALUPE, AND LAVACA COUNTIES). (a) The 25th Judicial District is composed of Colorado, Gonzales, Guadalupe, and Lavaca counties.

(b) The 25th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the Second 25th District Court.

(c) The terms of the 25th District Court begin:

(1) in Colorado County on the first Mondays in February and September;

(2) in Gonzales County on the first Mondays in January and June;

(3) in Guadalupe County on the first Mondays in March and October; and

(4) in Lavaca County on the first Mondays in April and November.

(d) The judges of the 25th and Second 25th judicial districts may hear and dispose of any suit or proceeding on either court's docket without transferring the suit or proceeding. The judges may transfer cases from one court to the other by an order entered on the docket of the court from which the matter was transferred. A case may not be transferred without the permission of the judge of the court to which the case is to be transferred.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.127. SECOND 25TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLORADO, GONZALES, GUADALUPE, AND LAVACA COUNTIES). (a) The Second 25th Judicial District is composed of Colorado, Gonzales, Guadalupe, and Lavaca counties.

(b) The terms of the Second 25th District Court begin:

(1) in Colorado County on the first Mondays in April and November;

(2) in Gonzales County on the first Mondays in May and December;

(3) in Guadalupe County on the first Mondays in February and September; and

(4) in Lavaca County on the first Mondays in January and June.

(c) Section 24.126, relating to the 25th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Second 25th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.128. 26TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WILLIAMSON COUNTY). (a) The 26th Judicial District is composed of Williamson County.

(b) The terms of the 26th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 530, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 363, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 24.129. 27TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BELL AND LAMPASAS COUNTIES). (a) The 27th Judicial District is composed of Bell and Lampasas counties.

(b) The 27th, 146th, 169th, 264th, 426th, and 478th judicial districts have concurrent jurisdiction in Bell County.

(c) The terms of the 27th District Court begin:

(1) in Bell County on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October; and

(2) in Lampasas County on the first Mondays in March and September and may continue in session until the Saturday night before the Monday on which the next session convenes.

(d) A grand jury may not be impaneled in the district courts in Bell County except by special order of the presiding judge.

(e) By order entered on the minutes of the court, the presiding judge of the district courts in Bell County may in his discretion, either in termtime or vacation, transfer any civil or criminal case to any of the other district courts. The order of transfer and all other orders made in the case shall be copied and certified by the clerk and the certified copies of the orders shall be filed with the papers of the transferred case. The additional fees caused by the transfer shall be taxed as part of the costs of the suit. When a cause is transferred, the clerk shall enter the cause on the docket of the court to which the transfer is made and the judge of that court shall try and dispose of the cause as if the cause had been filed in his court. Any of the judges may in his own courtroom try and determine any case or proceeding pending in any of the other courts without having the case transferred or may sit in any of the other courts and hear and determine any pending case. The judge hearing a transferred case shall indicate on the docket sheet and orders that he is sitting for that district. Two or more judges may try different cases in the same court at the same time, and each may occupy his own courtroom or the room of any other court. In case of absence, sickness, or disqualification, any of the other judges may hold court for him. All bail bonds, recognizances, or other obligations taken for the appearance of the defendants, parties, or witnesses in any of the district courts or in any inferior court in Bell County shall be binding on all the defendants, parties, and witnesses, and their sureties, in any of the courts in which the case is pending or to which the case is transferred. If a case is transferred, all process, bonds, recognizances, and obligations extant at the time of transfer shall be returned to and filed in the court to which the case is transferred and shall be valid and binding as if originally issued out of that court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 8(b), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 8(c), eff. January 1, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.01(a), eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 24.130. 28TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NUECES COUNTY). (a) The 28th Judicial District is composed of Nueces County.

(b) The 28th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the 94th and 117th district courts in Nueces County.

(c) The terms of the 28th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July. The terms are designated the January-July and July-January terms.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 28th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Nueces County to receive a guilty plea in a misdemeanor case pending in a county court at law in Nueces County and dispose of the case, regardless of whether the case is transferred to the district court. The judgment, order, or action of the district court is valid and binding as if the case were pending in the district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 24.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 72 (H.B. 2913), Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 24.131. 29TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (PALO PINTO COUNTY). (a) The 29th Judicial District is composed of Palo Pinto County.

(b) The terms of the 29th District Court begin on the first Monday in March, the first Monday after the third Saturday in June, and the first Monday after the fourth Saturday in October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.132. 30TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WICHITA COUNTY). (a) The 30th Judicial District is composed of Wichita County.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction prescribed by law, each district court in Wichita County has the civil jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 30th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(d) The 30th, 78th, and 89th district courts in Wichita County have concurrent jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.133. 31ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GRAY, HEMPHILL, LIPSCOMB, ROBERTS, AND WHEELER COUNTIES). (a) The 31st Judicial District is composed of Gray, Hemphill, Lipscomb, Roberts, and Wheeler counties.

(b) The terms of the 31st District Court begin:

(1) in Gray County on the first Mondays in January and July;

(2) in Hemphill County on the second Monday in April and the first Monday in November;

(3) in Lipscomb County on the fourth Monday in March and the second Monday in September;

(4) in Roberts County on the second Monday in March and the fourth Monday in August; and

(5) in Wheeler County on the fourth Mondays in April and November.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.134. 32ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FISHER, MITCHELL, AND NOLAN COUNTIES). (a) The 32nd Judicial District is composed of Fisher, Mitchell, and Nolan counties.

(b) The terms of the 32nd District Court in each county in the district begin on the first Mondays in January, May, and September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 34, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2002.

Sec. 24.135. 33RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BLANCO, BURNET, LLANO, AND SAN SABA COUNTIES). (a) The 33rd Judicial District is composed of Blanco, Burnet, Llano, and San Saba counties.

(b) The terms of the 33rd District Court begin:

(1) in Blanco County on the first Mondays in February and September;

(2) in Burnet County on the fourth Mondays in April and November;

(3) in Llano County on the first Mondays in April and November; and

(4) in San Saba County on the second Mondays in March and October.

(c) The judge of the 33rd District Court may impanel grand juries in each county. The judge of the 33rd District Court may alternate the drawing of grand juries with the judge of any other district court in each county within the 33rd Judicial District and may order grand and petit juries to be drawn for any term of the court as the judge determines is necessary, by an order entered in the minutes of the court. Indictments within each county may be returned to either court within that county.

(d) The 33rd District Court may hear and determine, in any county in the district convenient for the court, all preliminary or interlocutory matters in which a jury may not be demanded, in any case pending in any county in the district regardless of whether the case was filed in the county in which the hearing is held. Unless an objection is filed by a party to the suit, the 33rd District Court may hear, in any county in the district convenient for the court, any nonjury case pending in any county in the district, including divorces, adoptions, default judgments, and matters in which citation was by publication, regardless of whether the case was filed in the county in which the hearing is held.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.08(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 2150), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.136. 34TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 34th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) In El Paso County, the 34th, 41st, 65th, 120th, and 171st district courts have concurrent jurisdiction.

(c) The terms of the 34th District Court begin on the third Mondays in April and September and the first Mondays in January, July, and November.

(d) A grand jury may not be impaneled in any district court in El Paso County except the 34th District Court unless the judge of another district court in the county calls for a grand jury by special order.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 24.137. 35TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BROWN AND MILLS COUNTIES). (a) The 35th Judicial District is composed of Brown and Mills counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Mills County has the civil jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 35th District Court begin:

(1) in Brown County on the first Mondays in February, June, and November; and

(2) in Mills County on the first Mondays in January, May, and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.09(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.138. 36TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ARANSAS, BEE, LIVE OAK, MCMULLEN, AND SAN PATRICIO COUNTIES). (a) The 36th Judicial District is composed of Aransas, Bee, Live Oak, McMullen, and San Patricio counties.

(b) The terms of the 36th District Court begin:

(1) in Aransas County on the fourth Mondays in April and October;

(2) in Bee County on the first Mondays in April and October;

(3) in Live Oak County on the third Mondays in April and October;

(4) in McMullen County on the second Mondays in January and July; and

(5) in San Patricio County on the second Mondays in April and October.

(c) Each of the judges of the district courts in Aransas, Bee, Live Oak, McMullen, and San Patricio counties shall sign the minutes of each term of his court in each of the counties not later than the 30th day after the end of the term and shall also sign the minutes of the other courts covering the proceedings that were held before him.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 196, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 24.139. 37TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 37th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) This section applies to the 37th, 45th, 57th, 73rd, 131st, 144th, 150th, 166th, 175th, 186th, 187th, 224th, 225th, 226th, 227th, 285th, 288th, 289th, 290th, 379th, 386th, 399th, 407th, 408th, 436th, 437th, and 438th district courts in Bexar County.

(c) The district courts in Bexar County have concurrent jurisdiction.

(d) The 144th, 175th, 186th, 187th, 226th, 227th, 289th, 290th, 379th, 399th, and 437th district courts shall give preference to criminal cases. The terms of those courts begin on the first Mondays in January and July. Each term continues until the court has disposed of the business for that term.

(e) The terms of the 37th, 45th, 57th, 73rd, 131st, 150th, 166th, 224th, 225th, 285th, 288th, 407th, 408th, and 438th district courts begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(e-1) The 386th and 436th district courts shall give preference to juvenile matters under Title 3, Family Code. The terms of those courts begin on the first Mondays in July and January. Each term continues until the court has disposed of the business for that term.

(f) The district clerk shall docket successively on the dockets of the courts that do not give preference to criminal cases all civil cases and proceedings so that the civil cases and proceedings are docketed in rotation and equally distributed among the courts.

(g) The district clerk may consolidate the minutes of the district courts. If the clerk decides not to consolidate the minutes, the judge of each district court shall sign the minutes of each court term not later than the 30th day after the end of the term and shall also sign at the end of each volume of the minutes. Each judge sitting in a court shall sign the minutes of the proceedings held before him. If the clerk decides to consolidate the minutes, each judge may accept responsibility for the proceedings held before him by signing at the end of the minutes or at the end of the volume.

(h) All bonds taken for the appearance of defendants, parties, or witnesses in any district court or in any inferior court in Bexar County are binding on all defendants, parties, or witnesses, and their sureties, in any of the courts in which the case is pending or to which the case may be transferred. If a case is transferred, all process, bonds, recognizances, and obligations extant at the time of transfer shall be returned and filed in the court to which the case is transferred and are valid and binding as if originally issued out of that court.

(i) The judge of each district court may take a vacation at any time during the year. During a judge's vacation, the court term remains open, and the judge of any other district court may hold court during the judge's vacation. The judges of the district courts shall, by agreement among themselves, take their vacations so that there are district court judges in the county at all times.

(j) The Bexar County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend each court as required by law or by the judge.

(k) The judges of the courts that give preference to criminal cases may impanel special and general grand juries as needed or by agreement between the judges.

(l) By a majority vote, the judges of the courts that give preference to criminal cases may jointly appoint not more than four grand jury bailiffs. The bailiffs serve at the will of the judges and may be removed by a majority vote of the judges.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 165 (H.B. 2936), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 24.140. 38TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (REAL AND UVALDE COUNTIES). The 38th Judicial District is composed of Real and Uvalde counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.03(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.141. 39TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HASKELL, KENT, STONEWALL, AND THROCKMORTON COUNTIES). (a) The 39th Judicial District is composed of Haskell, Kent, Stonewall, and Throckmorton counties.

(b) The terms of the 39th District Court begin:

(1) in Haskell County on the first Monday in January, the 15th Monday after the first Monday in January, and the third Monday after the first Monday in September;

(2) in Kent County on the ninth Monday after the first Monday in January and the first Monday in September;

(3) in Stonewall County on the 6th and 20th Mondays after the first Monday in January and the ninth Monday after the first Monday in September; and

(4) in Throckmorton County on the 12th and 23rd Mondays after the first Monday in January and the 12th Monday after the first Monday in September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.142. 40TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ELLIS COUNTY). (a) The 40th Judicial District is composed of Ellis County.

(b) The terms of the 40th District Court begin on the first Mondays in March, June, September, and December.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.143. 41ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 41st Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) The terms of the 41st District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, March, May, September, and November.

(c) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 41st District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.144. 42ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CALLAHAN, COLEMAN, AND TAYLOR COUNTIES). (a) The 42nd Judicial District is composed of Callahan, Coleman, and Taylor counties.

(b) The 42nd District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the 104th District Court in Taylor County.

(c) The terms of the 42nd District Court begin:

(1) in Callahan County on the first Mondays in January and July;

(2) in Coleman County on the first Mondays in January and July; and

(3) in Taylor County on the first Monday in January, on the 15th Monday after the first Monday in January, and on the first Monday in September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1385, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.145. 43RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (PARKER COUNTY). (a) The 43rd Judicial District is composed of Parker County.

(b) The terms of the 43rd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.146. 44TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 44th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 44th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, June, and October.

(c) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 44th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.147. 45TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 45th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 45th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.148. 46TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FOARD, HARDEMAN, AND WILBARGER COUNTIES). (a) The 46th Judicial District is composed of Foard, Hardeman, and Wilbarger counties.

(b) The terms of the 46th District Court begin:

(1) in Foard County on the 6th, 17th, and 36th Mondays after the first Monday in January;

(2) in Hardeman County on the 8th, 19th, 38th, and 47th Mondays after the first Monday in January; and

(3) in Wilbarger County on the first Monday in January and the 11th, 22nd, and 41st Mondays after the first Monday in January.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.149. 47TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ARMSTRONG, POTTER, AND RANDALL COUNTIES). (a) The 47th Judicial District is composed of Armstrong, Potter, and Randall counties.

(b) The 47th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the 181st District Court in Randall and Potter counties. The 47th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the 108th District Court in Potter County.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081, Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

(d) The judge may, in any county in the 47th Judicial District:

(1) hear and determine all preliminary and interlocutory matters in which a jury may not be demanded, regardless of whether the case is filed in the county in which the hearing is held; and

(2) unless objection is filed by a party to the suit, hear any nonjury case, including divorces, adoptions, default judgments, and matters where citation was by publication, regardless of whether the case is filed in the county in which the hearing is held.

(e) The judge of the 47th District Court may transfer a case to the docket of any district court that has jurisdiction over the case with the approval of the judge of the court to which the case is transferred. If a case is transferred, all process and writs issued out of the transferring court are returnable to the court to which the case is transferred. All bonds executed and recognizances entered into in a transferring court shall bind the parties for their appearance or to fulfill the obligations of the bonds and recognizances at the terms of the court to which the transfer is made.

(f) Each sheriff of the counties in the district shall perform the duties prescribed by law in connection with the cases from that sheriff's county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 50 (H.B. 593), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2006.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081 (H.B. 3378), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 24.150. 48TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 48th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The terms of the 48th District Court begin on the first Mondays in February, May, August, and November.

(c) Section 24.118, relating to the 17th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 48th District Court.

(d) The 48th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 2454), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 24.151. 49TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WEBB AND ZAPATA COUNTIES). (a) The 49th Judicial District is composed of Webb and Zapata counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 49th District Court has the civil and criminal jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The 49th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the other district courts in Webb County.

(d) A criminal complaint may be presented to the grand jury of any district court in Webb County, and a resulting indictment may be returned to any other district court in Webb County with the appropriate criminal jurisdiction.

(e) The terms of the 49th District Court and the 341st District Court begin:

(1) in Webb County on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October; and

(2) in Zapata County on the first Mondays in February and August.

(f) In Webb County, the clerk of the district courts shall file all civil cases on the Clerk's Civil File Docket and shall number the cases consecutively. All civil cases not assigned and docketed in a district court based on the types of cases the court gives preference to under applicable law shall be assigned and docketed at random by the district clerk. The clerk shall keep a separate file docket, known as the Clerk's Criminal File Docket, for criminal cases. The clerk shall number the cases on the Clerk's Criminal File Docket consecutively with a separate series of numbers.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 34, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 121, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 205, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 17, eff. Jan. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 1(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 954 (H.B. 4037), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 750 (H.B. 1314), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 24.152. 50TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BAYLOR, COTTLE, KING, AND KNOX COUNTIES). (a) The 50th Judicial District is composed of Baylor, Cottle, King, and Knox counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the district court in Baylor, Cottle, King, and Knox Counties has the civil and criminal jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 50th District Court in each county begin on the first Mondays in January and September.

(d) In matters of concurrent jurisdiction, the judge of the county court in Baylor, Cottle, King, or Knox County may transfer a case to the judge of the 50th District Court with the approval of the district judge. When a case is transferred, all processes, writs, bonds, recognizances, or other obligations issued from the transferring court are returnable to the court to which the case is transferred as if originally issued by that court. The obligees in all bonds and recognizances taken in and for a court from which a case is transferred, and all witnesses summoned to appear in a court from which a case is transferred, are required to appear before the court to which a case is transferred as if originally required to appear before the court to which the transfer is made.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 342, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1146, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1147, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1148, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1495, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 515 (H.B. 788), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.153. 51ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COKE, IRION, SCHLEICHER, STERLING, AND TOM GREEN COUNTIES). (a) The 51st Judicial District is composed of Coke, Irion, Schleicher, Sterling, and Tom Green counties.

(b) The terms of the 51st District Court begin:

(1) in Coke County on the first Mondays in February and August;

(2) in Irion County on the first Mondays in March and September;

(3) in Schleicher County on the first Mondays in April and October;

(4) in Sterling County on the first Mondays in May and November; and

(5) in Tom Green County on the first Mondays in January and June.

(c) The judges of the 51st, 119th, 340th, and 391st district courts may, in their discretion, exchange benches and sit for each other without formal order in each county in those districts, including counties in which the districts do not overlap. Any of the judges may, in his own courtroom, try and determine any case or proceeding pending in any of the other courts without having the case transferred, or may sit in any of the other courts and hear and determine any case pending in one of those courts. The judges may try different cases filed in the same court at the same time, and each may occupy his own courtroom or the room of any other court. In case of absence, sickness, or disqualification of any of the judges, any of the other judges may hold court for him. Any of the judges may hear and determine any part or question of a case or proceeding pending in any of the courts, and any of the other judges may complete the hearing and render judgment in the case. Any of the judges may hear and determine motions, petitions for injunction, applications for appointment of receivers, interventions, motions to transfer venue, pleas in abatement, all dilatory pleas, motions for new trials, and all preliminary matters, questions, and proceedings, and may enter judgment or order thereon in the court in which the case is pending without having the case transferred to the court of the acting judge. The judge in whose court the case is pending may proceed to hear, complete, and determine any part or all of the case or other matter and render final judgment. Any of the judges may issue restraining orders and injunctions returnable to any of the other judges or courts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 6, eff. Oct. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.154. 52ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CORYELL COUNTY). (a) The 52nd Judicial District is composed of Coryell County.

(b) The terms of the 52nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.01, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.155. 53RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 53rd Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 53rd, 98th, and 126th district courts have concurrent jurisdiction.

(c) The terms of the 53rd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, March, May, and October.

(d) The judges of the district courts in Travis County do not have a duty to impanel grand juries but may impanel grand juries when they consider it necessary.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 355), Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2007.

Sec. 24.156. 54TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MCLENNAN COUNTY). (a) The 54th Judicial District is composed of McLennan County.

(a-1) The 54th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county court and the statutory county courts of McLennan County in misdemeanor cases as well as the jurisdiction prescribed by general law for district courts.

(b) The terms of the 54th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, March, May, July, September, and November.

(c) Section 24.120, relating to the 19th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 54th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 2230), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 24.157. 55TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 55th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 55th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.158. 56TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GALVESTON COUNTY). (a) The 56th Judicial District is composed of Galveston County.

(b) Section 24.111, relating to the 10th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 56th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.159. 57TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 57th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 57th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.160. 58TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JEFFERSON COUNTY). (a) The 58th Judicial District is composed of Jefferson County.

(b) The 58th, 60th, and 136th district courts have concurrent jurisdiction.

(c) The terms of the 58th and 60th district courts begin on the first Mondays in January and July. The first term is designated the January-June term, and the second term is designated the July-December term.

(d) In all suits, actions, and proceedings, it is sufficient for the address or designation to be "District Court of Jefferson County."

(e) The 58th, 60th, and 136th district courts may sit at the City of Port Arthur, in addition to Beaumont, to try, hear, and determine nonjury cases and to hear and determine motions, arguments, and the other nonjury matters that are within the jurisdiction of the courts. The district clerk or his deputy serves as clerk of a court when it sits in Port Arthur and may transfer all necessary books, minutes, records, and papers to Port Arthur while the court is in session there and transfer them from Port Arthur to Beaumont at the end of each session in Port Arthur. The Commissioners Court of Jefferson County may provide suitable quarters in the subcourthouse in Port Arthur for a court while it sits in Port Arthur. The Jefferson County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the courts in Port Arthur and perform all duties required by law or court order.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.161. 59TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GRAYSON COUNTY). (a) The 59th Judicial District is composed of Grayson County.

(b) The terms of the 59th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) The judge of the 59th District Court may impanel the grand jury in Grayson County as provided by law for any terms of his court that he considers proper.

(d) Section 24.116, relating to the 15th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 59th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 610 (H.B. 2174), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.162. 60TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JEFFERSON COUNTY). (a) The 60th Judicial District is composed of Jefferson County.

(b) Section 24.160, relating to the 58th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 60th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.163. 61ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 61st Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 61st District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.164. 62ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DELTA, FRANKLIN, HOPKINS, AND LAMAR COUNTIES). (a) The 62nd Judicial District is composed of Delta, Franklin, Hopkins, and Lamar counties.

(b) In any county in the district in which there are two or more district courts, those district courts have concurrent jurisdiction in that county.

(c) The terms of the 62nd District Court in each county begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(d) The judge of the 62nd District Court is not required to impanel a grand jury in that court in any county of the district unless the judge considers it necessary.

(e) Section 24.108, relating to the 8th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 62nd District Court in Delta, Franklin, and Hopkins counties.

(f) Section 24.106, relating to the 6th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 62nd District Court in Lamar County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.165. 63RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (KINNEY, TERRELL, AND VAL VERDE COUNTIES). (a) The 63rd Judicial District is composed of Kinney, Terrell, and Val Verde counties.

(b) The terms of the 63rd District Court begin:

(1) in Kinney County on the first Mondays in April and October;

(2) in Terrell County on the first Monday in February and the third Monday in August; and

(3) in Val Verde County on the first Mondays in January and June.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 852 (H.B. 3796), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 24.166. 64TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CASTRO, HALE, AND SWISHER COUNTIES). (a) The 64th Judicial District is composed of Castro, Hale, and Swisher counties.

(b) The terms of the 64th District Court in each county of the district begin on the first Mondays in January and July and are designated the January and July terms.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.167. 327TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 327th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) The terms of the 327th District Court begin on the first Mondays in February, April, June, September, October, and December.

(c) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 327th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 317, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1996.

Sec. 24.168. 66TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HILL COUNTY). (a) The 66th Judicial District is composed of Hill County.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 66th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the County Court of Hill County and the statutory county courts in Hill County in all civil and criminal matters over which the county court and the statutory county courts would have original or appellate jurisdiction. The district court has control over the assignment of cases as prescribed by Sections 25.1112 and 26.209.

(c) The terms of the 66th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, March, May, July, September, and November.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 959 (H.B. 1622), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.169. 67TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 67th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The terms of the 67th District Court begin on the first Mondays in March, June, September, and December.

(c) Section 24.118, relating to the 17th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 67th District Court.

(d) The 67th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 2454), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 24.170. 68TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 68th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 68th District Court begin on the first Mondays in February, May, September, and December.

(c) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 68th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.171. 69TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAM, HARTLEY, MOORE, AND SHERMAN COUNTIES). (a) The 69th Judicial District is composed of Dallam, Hartley, Moore, and Sherman counties.

(b) The terms of the 69th District Court begin:

(1) in Dallam County on the 16th Monday after the second Mondays in January and July;

(2) in Hartley County on the 12th Monday after the second Mondays in January and July;

(3) in Moore County on the 10th Monday after the second Mondays in January and July; and

(4) in Sherman County on the 14th Monday after the second Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.172. 70TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ECTOR COUNTY). (a) The 70th Judicial District is composed of Ector County.

(b) The terms of the 70th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) The judges of the 70th and 118th district courts may take a vacation and not attend court for six weeks in each year. The judges, by agreement, shall take their vacations alternately so that a judge is present in one of the courts at all times.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 880, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 24.173. 71ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRISON COUNTY). (a) The 71st Judicial District is composed of Harrison County.

(b) The terms of the 71st District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, March, May, July, September, and November and continue until the Saturday before the next succeeding term begins or until the court has disposed of the business for that term.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.174. 72ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CROSBY AND LUBBOCK COUNTIES). (a) The 72nd Judicial District is composed of Crosby and Lubbock counties.

(b) The terms of the 72nd District Court begin:

(1) in Crosby County on the second Mondays in May and November; and

(2) in Lubbock County on the second Mondays in February and August.

(c) The 72nd, 99th, 137th, and 140th district courts have concurrent jurisdiction in Lubbock County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.175. 73RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 73rd Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 73rd District Court.

(c) The 73rd District Court shall give preference to civil cases and to cases and proceedings under Title 3, Family Code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 67, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 24.176. 74TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MCLENNAN COUNTY). (a) The 74th Judicial District is composed of McLennan County.

(a-1) The 74th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county court and the statutory county courts of McLennan County in misdemeanor cases as well as the jurisdiction prescribed by general law for district courts.

(b) The terms of the 74th District Court begin on the second Mondays in February, April, June, August, October, and December.

(c) Section 24.120, relating to the 19th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 74th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 2230), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 24.177. 75TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LIBERTY COUNTY). (a) The 75th Judicial District is composed of Liberty County.

(b) The terms of the 75th District Court begin on the first Mondays in April and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.178. 76TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMP, MORRIS, AND TITUS COUNTIES). (a) The 76th Judicial District is composed of Camp, Morris, and Titus counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Morris County has the civil jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) In Camp and Morris counties, the 76th District Court and the county court have concurrent jurisdiction over all original and appellate criminal matters over which the county court has jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state. In each county, matters and proceedings in the concurrent jurisdiction of the courts may be filed in or transferred between the 76th District Court and the county court. All writs and processes issued and bonds and recognizances made in transferred cases are returnable to the court to which the case is transferred as if originally issued in that court.

(d) In Camp, Morris, and Titus counties, the 76th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the 276th District Court. The judges of the courts may transfer any case to be tried in Camp County, Morris County, or Titus County with the consent of the court to which the case is to be transferred. Each judge may sit in the other court without transferring the case.

(e) The terms of the 76th District Court begin:

(1) in Camp County on the first Mondays in March and April;

(2) in Morris County on the first Mondays in January, May, July, and November and the third Monday in September; and

(3) in Titus County on the first Mondays in February, August, September, October, and December.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.179. 77TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FREESTONE AND LIMESTONE COUNTIES). (a) The 77th Judicial District is composed of Freestone and Limestone counties.

(b) The 77th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the 87th District Court in Freestone and Limestone counties.

(c) The terms of the 77th District Court begin:

(1) in Freestone County on the first Mondays in February, May, August, and November; and

(2) in Limestone County on the first Mondays in December, March, June, and September.

(d) The judge of the 77th District Court shall impanel grand juries in Limestone County at the March and September terms and in Freestone County at the May and November terms and at any other terms of the court in each county as ordered by the judge.

(e) The clerk of the district courts in each of the counties of Limestone and Freestone shall prepare civil, criminal, divorce, and tax dockets for each district court and shall file each new case in the court in which the party filing the case directed the clerk to file it. Each criminal case shall be originally filed in the court to which the indictment or information is returned. The district clerk in each county shall place letters on the envelope containing the file papers in each case after the number of the case, designating by the letter "A" cases pending in the 77th District Court and by the letter "B" cases pending in the 87th District Court.

(f) The judges of the 77th and 87th judicial districts may, in their discretion, either in termtime or in vacation, on motion of any party, on agreement of the parties, or on their own motion to facilitate the administration of justice or to equalize the case load, transfer any civil or criminal cause on their dockets to the docket of the other court. The transfer shall be entered on the minutes of the court and the cause shall be tried and disposed of as if it had been originally filed in that court. The transferring court need not hold a formal proceeding to transfer a cause. The receiving court need not receive the transcript of the transferred cause to have jurisdiction over the cause.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.180. 78TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WICHITA COUNTY). (a) The 78th Judicial District is composed of Wichita County.

(b) The terms of the 78th District Court begin on the first Mondays in March, June, September, and December.

(c) Section 24.132, relating to the 30th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 78th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.181. 79TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BROOKS AND JIM WELLS COUNTIES). (a) The 79th Judicial District is composed of Brooks and Jim Wells counties.

(b) The terms of the 79th District Court begin:

(1) in Brooks County at 10 a.m. on the first Mondays in February and September; and

(2) in Jim Wells County at 10 a.m. on the first Mondays in March and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.182. 80TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 80th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 80th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.183. 81ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ATASCOSA, FRIO, KARNES, LASALLE, AND WILSON COUNTIES). (a) The 81st Judicial District is composed of Atascosa, Frio, Karnes, LaSalle, and Wilson counties.

(b) The terms of the 81st District Court begin:

(1) in Atascosa County on the third Mondays in March and September;

(2) in Frio County on the fourth Mondays in May and November;

(3) in Karnes County on the first Mondays in May and November;

(4) in LaSalle County on the first Mondays in March and September; and

(5) in Wilson County on the second Mondays in April and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.184. 82ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FALLS AND ROBERTSON COUNTIES). (a) The 82nd Judicial District is composed of Falls and Robertson counties.

(b) The terms of the 82nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.10(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 141, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1989.

Sec. 24.185. 83RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (PECOS, TERRELL, AND VAL VERDE COUNTIES). (a) The 83rd Judicial District is composed of Pecos, Terrell, and Val Verde counties.

(b) The 83rd and 112th district courts have concurrent jurisdiction in Pecos County.

(c) The 83rd and 63rd district courts have concurrent jurisdiction in Terrell and Val Verde counties.

(d) The terms of the 83rd District Court begin on the second Monday in January and July.

(e) In each of the counties of Pecos, Terrell, and Val Verde, a petition or other pleading filed in the district courts is sufficient if addressed "To The District Court of Pecos County, Texas,", "To The District Court of Terrell County, Texas,", or "To The District Court of Val Verde County, Texas," respectively, without giving the number of the district court in the address.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 509, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 24, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 24.186. 84TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HANSFORD, HUTCHINSON, AND OCHILTREE COUNTIES). (a) The 84th Judicial District is composed of Hansford, Hutchinson, and Ochiltree counties.

(b) The terms of the 84th District Court begin:

(1) in Hansford County on the third Monday in March and the second Monday in September;

(2) in Hutchinson County on the first Monday in June and the fourth Monday in November; and

(3) in Ochiltree County on the fourth Monday in April and the second Monday in October.

(c) Each term provided by Subsection (b) begins at 10 a.m. on the first day of the term.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.187. 85TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZOS COUNTY). (a) The 85th Judicial District is composed of Brazos County.

(b) The 85th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the statutory county courts of Brazos County in misdemeanor cases as well as the jurisdiction prescribed by general law for district courts.

(c) The terms of the 85th District Court begin on the first Mondays in April and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 280, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 24.188. 86TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (KAUFMAN COUNTY). (a) The 86th Judicial District is composed of Kaufman County.

(b) The terms of the 86th District Court begin on the first Mondays in February and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1124, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 24.189. 87TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ANDERSON, FREESTONE, LEON, AND LIMESTONE COUNTIES). (a) The 87th Judicial District is composed of Anderson, Freestone, Leon, and Limestone counties.

(b) The terms of the 87th District Court begin:

(1) in Anderson County on the first Mondays in February and August;

(2) in Freestone County on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October;

(3) in Leon County on the fifth Monday after the first Mondays in May and November; and

(4) in Limestone County on the first Mondays in May and November.

(c) The judge of the 87th District Court shall impanel grand juries in Limestone County at the May and November terms and in Freestone County at the January and July terms and at any other terms of the court as ordered by the judge.

(d) Section 24.179, relating to the 77th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 87th District Court in Freestone and Limestone counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.190. 88TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARDIN AND TYLER COUNTIES). (a) The 88th Judicial District is composed of Hardin and Tyler counties.

(b) The terms of the 88th District Court begin:

(1) in Hardin County on the first Mondays in April and October; and

(2) in Tyler County on the first Mondays in June and December.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.191. 89TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WICHITA COUNTY). (a) The 89th Judicial District is composed of Wichita County.

(b) The terms of the 89th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) A grand jury may not be impaneled in the 89th District Court unless the judge of that court calls for a grand jury by special order on the minutes of the court.

(d) Section 24.132, relating to the 30th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 89th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.192. 90TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (STEPHENS AND YOUNG COUNTIES). (a) The 90th Judicial District is composed of Stephens and Young counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Stephens County has the civil and criminal jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 90th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 230, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

Sec. 24.193. 91ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EASTLAND COUNTY). (a) The 91st Judicial District is composed of Eastland County.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Eastland County has the civil jurisdiction of a county court. The district court has concurrent with the county court the criminal jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 91st District Court begin on the first Mondays in February, April, June, August, October, and December.

(d) The 91st District Court may not impanel a grand jury except by special order of the judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 15, Sec. 1, eff. April 14, 1987.

Sec. 24.194. 92ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 92nd Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) The 92nd, 93rd, and 139th district courts have concurrent jurisdiction.

(c) The terms of the 92nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(d) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.195. 93RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 93rd Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) The terms of the 93rd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.194, relating to the 92nd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 93rd District Court.

(d) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(b), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.196. 94TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NUECES COUNTY). (a) The 94th Judicial District is composed of Nueces County.

(b) The terms of the 94th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July. The terms are designated the January-July and July-January terms.

(c) Section 24.130, relating to the 28th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 94th District Court.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 94th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Nueces County to receive a guilty plea in a misdemeanor case pending in a county court at law in Nueces County and dispose of the case, regardless of whether the case is transferred to the district court. The judgment, order, or action of the district court is valid and binding as if the case were pending in the district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 72 (H.B. 2913), Sec. 2, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 24.197. 95TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 95th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 95th District Court begin on the first Mondays in March, June, September, and December.

(c) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 95th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.198. 96TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 96th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) Section 24.118, relating to the 17th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 96th Judicial District.

(c) The 96th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 2454), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 24.199. 97TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ARCHER, CLAY, AND MONTAGUE COUNTIES). (a) The 97th Judicial District is composed of Archer, Clay, and Montague counties.

(b) The terms of the 97th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.200. 98TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 98th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The terms of the 98th District Court begin on the first Mondays in February, April, June, October, and December.

(c) Section 24.155, relating to the 53rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 98th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.201. 99TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LUBBOCK COUNTY). (a) The 99th Judicial District is composed of Lubbock County.

(b) The terms of the 99th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.174, relating to the 72nd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 99th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.202. 100TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CARSON, CHILDRESS, COLLINGSWORTH, DONLEY, AND HALL COUNTIES). (a) The 100th Judicial District is composed of Carson, Childress, Collingsworth, Donley, and Hall counties.

(b) The terms of the 100th District Court begin:

(1) in Carson County on the first Mondays in January and August;

(2) in Childress County on the first Mondays in May and December;

(3) in Collingsworth County on the first Mondays in April and November;

(4) in Donley County on the first Mondays in March and October; and

(5) in Hall County on the first Mondays in February and September.

(c) Each term provided by Subsection (b) begins at 10 a.m. on the first day of the term.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.203. 101ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 101st Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 101st District Court begin on the first Mondays in March, June, September, and December.

(c) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 101st District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.204. 102ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BOWIE AND RED RIVER COUNTIES). (a) The 102nd Judicial District is composed of Bowie and Red River counties.

(b) The terms of the 102nd District Court begin in each county on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.105, relating to the 5th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 102nd District Court in Bowie County.

(d) Section 24.106, relating to the 6th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 102nd District Court in Red River County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1012, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 733 (H.B. 1048), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 24.205. 103RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON COUNTY). (a) The 103rd Judicial District is composed of Cameron County. The court shall give preference to civil cases.

(b) The 103rd, 107th, and 138th district courts have concurrent jurisdiction.

(c) The terms of the 103rd District Court begin on the first Mondays in February and July.

(d) The judges of the 103rd and 107th district courts need not impanel grand juries except in cases of emergency.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 5(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.206. 104TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TAYLOR COUNTY). (a) The 104th Judicial District is composed of Taylor County.

(b) The terms of the 104th District Court begin on the 11th and 24th Mondays after the first Monday in January and the ninth Monday after the first Monday in September.

(c) The commissioners court shall provide suitable quarters in the county courthouse for the court and the officers of the court.

(d) Section 24.144, relating to the 42nd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 104th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.207. 105TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (KENEDY, KLEBERG, AND NUECES COUNTIES). (a) The 105th Judicial District is composed of Kenedy, Kleberg, and Nueces counties. The court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(b) The terms of the 105th District Court begin:

(1) in Kenedy County on the first Mondays in June and December;

(2) in Kleberg County on the first Mondays in April and October; and

(3) in Nueces County on the first Mondays in February and August.

(c) The judge, with the approval of the commissioners court, may appoint an official interpreter of the court in Nueces County who serves at the will of the judge. The official interpreter shall take both the constitutional oath of office and an oath that he will faithfully interpret all testimony in the district court as official interpreter. The oath is sufficient for his service as official interpreter in all cases in the court in Nueces County during the interpreter's term of office. The judge may also assign the official interpreter to assist the court's probation officer in the discharge of the probation officer's duties.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 105th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Nueces County to receive a guilty plea in a misdemeanor case pending in a county court at law in Nueces County and dispose of the case, regardless of whether the case is transferred to the district court. The judgment, order, or action of the district court is valid and binding as if the case were pending in the district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 72 (H.B. 2913), Sec. 3, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 24.208. 106TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DAWSON, GAINES, GARZA, AND LYNN COUNTIES). (a) The 106th Judicial District is composed of Dawson, Gaines, Garza, and Lynn counties.

(b) The terms of the 106th District Court begin:

(1) in Dawson County on the third Monday in February and the second Monday in September;

(2) in Gaines County on the first Mondays in April and October;

(3) in Garza County on the first Monday in March and the fourth Monday in September; and

(4) in Lynn County on the first Monday in February and the third Monday in September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.209. 107TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON COUNTY). (a) The 107th Judicial District is composed of Cameron County. The court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(b) The terms of the 107th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.205, relating to the 103rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 107th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 5(b), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.210. 108TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (POTTER COUNTY). (a) The 108th Judicial District is composed of Potter County.

(b) The terms of the 108th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, May, and September.

(c) Section 24.149, relating to the 47th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 108th District Court in Potter County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.211. 109TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ANDREWS, CRANE, AND WINKLER COUNTIES). (a) The 109th Judicial District is composed of Andrews, Crane, and Winkler counties.

(b) The terms of the 109th District Court begin:

(1) in Andrews County on the second Monday in January and the first Monday in July;

(2) in Crane County on the first Mondays in February and August; and

(3) in Winkler County on the first Monday in March and the second Monday in September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.212. 110TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRISCOE, DICKENS, FLOYD, AND MOTLEY COUNTIES). (a) The 110th Judicial District is composed of Briscoe, Dickens, Floyd, and Motley counties.

(b) The terms of the 110th District Court begin in each county on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 24.213. 111TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WEBB COUNTY). (a) The 111th Judicial District is composed of Webb County.

(b) The terms of the 111th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October. Each term continues until the court disposes of its business.

(c) The 111th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the other district courts in Webb County.

(d) Section 24.151, relating to the 49th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 111th District Court in Webb County.

(e) A criminal complaint may be presented to the grand jury of any district court in Webb County, and a resulting indictment may be returned to any other district court in Webb County with the appropriate criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 750 (H.B. 1314), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 24.214. 112TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CROCKETT, PECOS, REAGAN, SUTTON, AND UPTON COUNTIES). (a) The 112th Judicial District is composed of Crockett, Pecos, Reagan, Sutton, and Upton counties.

(b) The terms of the 112th District Court begin:

(1) in Crockett County on the first Monday in April and the third Monday in September;

(2) in Pecos County on the first Mondays in May and November;

(3) in Reagan County on the first Mondays in March and October;

(4) in Sutton County on the third Monday in March and the first Monday in September; and

(5) in Upton County on the first Monday in February and the second Monday in June.

(c) Section 24.185, relating to the 83rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 112th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 220 (H.B. 2256), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.215. 113TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 113th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 113th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.216. 114TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (SMITH COUNTY). (a) The 114th Judicial District is composed of Smith County.

(b) The terms of the 114th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.217. 115TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MARION AND UPSHUR COUNTIES). (a) The 115th Judicial District is composed of Marion and Upshur counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 115th District Court has the civil and criminal jurisdiction of a county court in Marion County. The County Court of Marion County has concurrent jurisdiction to receive guilty pleas in misdemeanor cases. Matters within the courts' concurrent jurisdiction may be filed in either court and may be transferred between the district court and county court.

(c) The 115th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the 276th District Court in Marion County. The judges of the courts may transfer any case on their dockets in Marion County with the consent of the judge to which the case is transferred. Each judge may sit in the other court to hear a case without transferring the case.

(d) All writs and processes issued and bonds and recognizances made in transferred cases are returnable to the court to which transferred, as if originally issued there.

(e) The terms of the 115th District Court begin:

(1) in Marion County on the first Mondays in March and September; and

(2) in Upshur County on the first Mondays in January and June.

(f) The court terms continue until and including the Saturday immediately before the Monday on which the next term will convene.

(g) The officers serving the 276th District Court in Marion County shall also serve the 115th District Court in Marion County.

(h) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the district court having jurisdiction in Upshur County has the civil and criminal jurisdiction, other than probate jurisdiction, of a county court. All civil and criminal matters within the concurrent jurisdiction of the county and district courts must be filed with the county clerk in the county court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.12(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.218. 116TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 116th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 116th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 116th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.219. 117TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NUECES COUNTY). (a) The 117th Judicial District is composed of Nueces County.

(b) The terms of the 117th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July. The terms are designated the January-July and July-January terms.

(c) Section 24.130, relating to the 28th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 117th District Court.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 117th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Nueces County to receive a guilty plea in a misdemeanor case pending in a county court at law in Nueces County and dispose of the case, regardless of whether the case is transferred to the district court. The judgment, order, or action of the district court is valid and binding as if the case were pending in the district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 72 (H.B. 2913), Sec. 4, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 24.220. 118TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GLASSCOCK, HOWARD, AND MARTIN COUNTIES). (a) The 118th Judicial District is composed of Glasscock, Howard, and Martin counties.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, each district court in Glasscock County has the civil jurisdiction of a county court.

(c) The terms of the 118th District Court begin:

(1) in Glasscock County on the first Mondays in February and September;

(2) in Howard County on the fourth Mondays in January, June, August, and October; and

(3) in Martin County on the first Mondays in January, June, and October.

(d) The judges of the 70th and 118th district courts may take a vacation and not attend court for six weeks in each year. The judges, by agreement, shall take their vacations alternately so that a judge is present in one of the courts at all times.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.221. 119TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CONCHO, RUNNELS, AND TOM GREEN COUNTIES). (a) The 119th Judicial District is composed of Concho, Runnels, and Tom Green counties.

(b) The terms of the 119th District Court begin:

(1) in Concho County on the first Mondays in February and July;

(2) in Runnels County on the first Mondays in March and October; and

(3) in Tom Green County on the first Mondays in April and November.

(c) Section 24.153, relating to the 51st District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 119th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.222. 120TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 120th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) The terms of the 120th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) The El Paso County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the court when required by law or by the judge.

(d) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 120th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.223. 121ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TERRY AND YOAKUM COUNTIES). (a) The 121st Judicial District is composed of Terry and Yoakum counties.

(b) The terms of the 121st District Court begin:

(1) in Terry County on the second Mondays in May and November; and

(2) in Yoakum County on the second Mondays in June and December.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.224. 122ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GALVESTON COUNTY). (a) The 122nd Judicial District is composed of Galveston County.

(b) The 122nd District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the 10th and 56th district courts.

(c) The terms of the 122nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(d) Section 24.111, relating to the 10th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 122nd District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.225. 123RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (PANOLA AND SHELBY COUNTIES). (a) The 123rd Judicial District is composed of Panola and Shelby counties.

(b) The terms of the 123rd District Court begin:

(1) in Panola County on the first Mondays in January, May, and September; and

(2) in Shelby County on the first Mondays in March, July, and November.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.226. 124TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GREGG COUNTY). (a) The 124th Judicial District is composed of Gregg County.

(b) The terms of the 124th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, March, May, July, September, and November.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.227. 125TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 125th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 125th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.228. 126TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 126th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The terms of the 126th District Court begin on the first Mondays in September and November and the third Mondays in January, March, and June.

(c) Section 24.155, relating to the 53rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 126th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.229. 127TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 127th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 127th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.230. 128TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ORANGE COUNTY). (a) The 128th Judicial District is composed of Orange County.

(b) The 128th and 163rd district courts have concurrent jurisdiction in Orange County.

(c) The terms of the 128th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, May, and September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.231. 129TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 129th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 129th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.232. 130TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MATAGORDA COUNTY). (a) The 130th Judicial District is composed of Matagorda County.

(b) The terms of the 130th District Court begin on the first Mondays in March and September and are designated as the March-August and September-February terms.

(c) Section 24.124, relating to the 23rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 130th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.233. 131ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 131st Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 131st District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.234. 132ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BORDEN AND SCURRY COUNTIES). (a) The 132nd Judicial District is composed of Borden and Scurry counties.

(b) The terms of the 132nd District Court begin:

(1) in Borden County on the first Mondays in January, March, May, July, September, and November; and

(2) in Scurry County on the first Mondays in February, April, June, August, October, and December.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.235. 133RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 133rd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 133rd District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.236. 134TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 134th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 134th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 134th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.237. 135TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CALHOUN, DEWITT, GOLIAD, JACKSON, REFUGIO, AND VICTORIA COUNTIES). (a) The 135th Judicial District is composed of Calhoun, DeWitt, Goliad, Jackson, Refugio, and Victoria counties.

(b) The terms of the 135th District Court in each county of the district begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.238. 136TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JEFFERSON COUNTY). (a) The 136th Judicial District is composed of Jefferson County.

(b) The terms of the 136th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July. The terms are designated the January-June and July-December terms.

(c) The Jefferson County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the court as required by law or by the judge.

(d) Section 24.160, relating to the 58th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 136th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.239. 137TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LUBBOCK COUNTY). (a) The 137th Judicial District is composed of Lubbock County.

(b) The terms of the 137th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.174, relating to the 72nd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 137th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.240. 138TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON COUNTY). (a) The 138th Judicial District is composed of Cameron County. The court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(b) The terms of the 138th District Court begin on the first Mondays in March, July, and November.

(c) The judge of the 138th District Court shall impanel grand juries at all times required by law.

(d) Section 24.205, relating to the 103rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 138th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 5(c), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.241. 139TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 139th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) The terms of the 139th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.194, relating to the 92nd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 139th District Court.

(d) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(c), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(3), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.242. 140TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LUBBOCK COUNTY). (a) The 140th Judicial District is composed of Lubbock County.

(b) The terms of the 140th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.174, relating to the 72nd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 140th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.243. 142ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MIDLAND COUNTY). (a) The 142nd Judicial District is composed of Midland County.

(b) The terms of the 142nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July of each year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 93, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1996.

Sec. 24.244. 143RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LOVING, REEVES, AND WARD COUNTIES). (a) The 143rd Judicial District is composed of Loving, Reeves, and Ward counties.

(b) The terms of the 143rd District Court begin:

(1) in Loving County on the first Mondays in April and August and the third Monday in December;

(2) in Reeves County on the first Monday in January and the third Mondays in May, August, and October; and

(3) in Ward County on the third Monday in February, the first Monday in June, the third Monday in September, and the first Monday in December.

(c) The terms provided by Subsection (b) begin at 10 a.m. on the first day of the term.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.245. 144TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 144th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 144th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.246. 145TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NACOGDOCHES COUNTY). (a) The 145th Judicial District is composed of Nacogdoches County.

(b) The terms of the 145th District Court begin on the first Mondays in March and September.

(c) The judge may take a vacation and not attend court for four weeks in each year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.247. 146TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BELL COUNTY). (a) The 146th Judicial District is composed of Bell County.

(b) The terms of the 146th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.129, relating to the 27th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 146th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.248. 147TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 147th Judicial District is composed of Travis County. The court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(b) The terms of the 147th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 85, Sec. 4, eff. May 14, 2007.

(d) Section 24.155, relating to the 53rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 147th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 355), Sec. 2, eff. May 14, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 355), Sec. 4, eff. May 14, 2007.

Sec. 24.249. 150TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 150th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 150th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.250. 151ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 151st Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 151st District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.251. 152ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 152nd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 152nd District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.252. 153RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 153rd Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The terms of the 153rd District Court begin on the first Mondays in February, May, August, and November.

(c) The Tarrant County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the court as required by law or by the judge.

(d) Section 24.118, relating to the 17th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 153rd District Court.

(e) The 153rd District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 2454), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 24.253. 154TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LAMB COUNTY). (a) The 154th Judicial District is composed of Lamb County.

(b) The terms of the 154th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July and are designated as the January and July terms.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.254. 155TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (AUSTIN AND FAYETTE COUNTIES). (a) The 155th Judicial District is composed of Austin and Fayette counties.

(b) The sheriff of each county or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the court as required by law or by the judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 9(l), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.02(a), eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 24.255. 156TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ARANSAS, BEE, LIVE OAK, MCMULLEN, AND SAN PATRICIO COUNTIES). (a) The 156th Judicial District is composed of Aransas, Bee, Live Oak, McMullen, and San Patricio counties.

(b) The terms of the 156th District Court in each county begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.138, relating to the 36th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 156th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.256. 157TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 157th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 157th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.257. 160TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 160th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 160th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 160th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.258. 161ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ECTOR COUNTY). (a) The 161st Judicial District is composed of Ector County.

(b) The 161st District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the other district courts in Ector County.

(c) The terms of the 161st District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(d) The Ector County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the court as required by law or by the judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 880, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 24.259. 162ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 162nd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the 162nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 162nd District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.260. 163RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ORANGE COUNTY). (a) The 163rd Judicial District is composed of Orange County.

(b) The terms of the 163rd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, May, and September.

(c) The Orange County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the court as required by law or by the judge.

(d) Section 24.230, relating to the 128th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 163rd District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.261. 164TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 164th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 164th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.262. 165TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 165th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Section 24.112, relating to the 11th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 165th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.263. 166TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 166th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 166th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.264. 167TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 167th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The terms of the 167th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.155, relating to the 53rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 167th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 355), Sec. 3, eff. May 14, 2007.

Sec. 24.265. 170TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MCLENNAN COUNTY). (a) The 170th Judicial District is composed of McLennan County.

(a-1) The 170th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county court and the statutory county courts of McLennan County in misdemeanor cases as well as the jurisdiction prescribed by general law for district courts.

(b) The terms of the 170th District Court begin on the second Mondays in February, April, June, August, October, and December.

(c) Section 24.120, relating to the 19th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 170th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 2230), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 24.266. 171ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 171st Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) The terms of the 171st District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 171st District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.267. 174TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 174th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Subsections (c), (e), and (f) apply to the 174th, 176th, 177th, 178th, and 179th district courts.

(c) Each of the district courts has concurrent jurisdiction with the other district courts in Harris County.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

(e) The judges of the district courts shall, by agreement among themselves, take their vacations alternately so that there are at all times at least six district court judges in the county.

(f) The Harris County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the courts as required by law or by the judges.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.268. 175TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 175th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 175th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.269. 176TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 176th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Section 24.267, relating to the 174th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 176th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.270. 177TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 177th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Section 24.267, relating to the 174th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 177th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.271. 178TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 178th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Section 24.267, relating to the 174th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 178th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.272. 179TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 179th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Section 24.267, relating to the 174th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 179th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.273. 180TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 180th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 180th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the other district courts in Harris County.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.274. 186TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 186th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 186th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.275. 216TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GILLESPIE AND KERR COUNTIES). The 216th Judicial District is composed of Gillespie and Kerr counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.03(a), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.02(a), eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.276. 229TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DUVAL, JIM HOGG, AND STARR COUNTIES). (a) The 229th Judicial District is composed of Duval, Jim Hogg, and Starr counties.

(b) The terms of the 229th District Court begin:

(1) in Duval County on the first Mondays in February and August;

(2) in Jim Hogg County on the first Mondays in June and December; and

(3) in Starr County on the first Mondays in April and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER C. JUDICIAL DISTRICTS ACT OF 1969

Sec. 24.301. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER. Except as otherwise indicated by the context, this subchapter applies only to judicial districts listed in this subchapter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.306. JUVENILE BOARDS. The district judge of any district listed in this subchapter is a member of the juvenile board in each county within his district in which a juvenile board exists.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.310. SPECIAL DISTRICT COURTS. Each court listed in this subchapter that is directed to give preference to specific matters or types of cases shall participate in all matters relating to juries, grand juries, indictments, and docketing of cases in the same manner as the existing district courts that are similarly directed within that county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.351. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 1-A (JASPER, NEWTON, AND TYLER COUNTIES). (a) Judicial District 1-A is composed of Jasper, Newton, and Tyler counties.

(b) The jurisdiction of the court of Judicial District 1-A is concurrent with the jurisdiction of the other district courts in Jasper, Newton, and Tyler counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.352. 141ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 141st Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 141st District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 2454), Sec. 6, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 24.353. 148TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NUECES COUNTY). (a) The 148th Judicial District is composed of Nueces County.

(b) The 148th District Court shall give first preference to family law matters and second preference to criminal cases.

(c) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 148th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Nueces County to receive a guilty plea in a misdemeanor case pending in a county court at law in Nueces County and dispose of the case, regardless of whether the case is transferred to the district court. The judgment, order, or action of the district court is valid and binding as if the case were pending in the district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 72 (H.B. 2913), Sec. 5, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 24.354. 149TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZORIA COUNTY). The 149th Judicial District is composed of Brazoria County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.355. 158TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 158th Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.356. 159TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ANGELINA COUNTY). The 159th Judicial District is composed of Angelina County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.357. 168TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 168th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 168th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.358. 169TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BELL COUNTY). (a) The 169th Judicial District is composed of Bell County.

(b) The terms of the 169th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.359. 172ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JEFFERSON COUNTY). The 172nd Judicial District is composed of Jefferson County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.360. 173RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HENDERSON COUNTY). The 173rd Judicial District is composed of Henderson County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.361. 181ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (POTTER AND RANDALL COUNTIES). (a) The 181st Judicial District is composed of Potter and Randall counties.

(b) The 181st District Court may hear and determine, in any county in the district convenient for the court, all preliminary or interlocutory matters in which a jury may not be demanded, in any case pending in any county in the district regardless of whether the case was filed in the county in which the hearing is held. Unless there is an objection filed by a party to the suit, the 181st District Court may hear, in any county in the district convenient for the court, any nonjury case pending in any county in the district, including divorces, adoptions, default judgments, and matters in which citation was by publication, regardless of whether the case was filed in the county in which the hearing is held.

(c) Section 24.149, relating to the 47th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 181st District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.362. 182ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 182nd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 182nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.363. 183RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 183rd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 183rd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.364. 184TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 184th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 184th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.365. 185TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 185th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 185th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.366. 187TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 187th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 187th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1997, 74th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.367. 188TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GREGG COUNTY). The 188th Judicial District is composed of Gregg County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.368. 189TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 189th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.369. 190TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 190th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.370. 191ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 191st Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.371. 192ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 192nd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.372. 193RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 193rd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.373. 194TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 194th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 194th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.374. 195TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 195th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 195th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.375. 196TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HUNT COUNTY). The 196th Judicial District is composed of Hunt County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.376. 197TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON AND WILLACY COUNTIES). (a) The 197th Judicial District is composed of Cameron and Willacy counties.

(b) The 197th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.377. 198TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BANDERA AND KERR COUNTIES). (a) The 198th Judicial District is composed of Bandera and Kerr Counties.

(b) The judge of the 198th District Court may impanel grand juries in each county. The judge of the 198th District Court may alternate the drawing of grand juries with the judge of any other district court in each county within the judge's district and may order grand and petit juries to be drawn for any term of the judge's court as in the judge's judgment is necessary, by an order entered in the minutes of the court. Indictments within each county may be returned to either court within that county.

(c) In addition to the requirements under Article 59.06, Code of Criminal Procedure, the district attorney for the 198th Judicial District may use proceeds from the sale of forfeited property, after the deduction of amounts described by Article 59.06(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, for the official purposes of the office of the district attorney only on the approval of:

(1) the commissioners court of each county in the judicial district; or

(2) a regional review committee composed of three members who are a county judge, a county attorney, a county commissioner or a county sheriff, each appointed by the member of the house of representatives of this state who represents the counties in the judicial district.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 623, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 852 (H.B. 3796), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 852 (H.B. 3796), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1321 (S.B. 316), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.03(b), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 2150), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.378. 199TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 199th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.379. 200TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). The 200th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.380. 201ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). The 201st Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.381. 202ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BOWIE COUNTY). (a) The 202nd Judicial District is composed of Bowie County.

(b) The 202nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) The jurisdiction of the 202nd District Court in Bowie County is concurrent and coextensive with the 5th and 102nd district courts.

(d) The terms of the 202nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July. During each term of court in Bowie County, the court may sit in Texarkana to try, hear, and determine any civil nonjury case, may hear and determine motions, agreements, and other nonjury civil matters that come before the court, and may hear and determine any criminal nonjury matters, including pleas of guilty, both felony and misdemeanor, when a jury has been waived. This subsection does not limit the court's power to hear those matters in Boston.

(e) The clerk of the district court of Bowie County serves as the clerk of the 202nd District Court. The district clerk of Bowie County or his deputy shall serve the court when it is sitting in Texarkana and may transfer all necessary books, minutes, and records to Texarkana while the court is in session there, and may transfer all necessary books, minutes, records, and papers from Texarkana to Boston at the end of each session in Texarkana.

(f) The sheriff of Bowie County or his deputy shall attend the court while it is sitting in Texarkana and shall perform the duties required by law or under the order of the court.

(g) Section 24.105, relating to the 5th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 202nd District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1012, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.382. 203RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 203rd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 203rd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.383. 204TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 204th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 204th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.384. 205TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CULBERSON, EL PASO, AND HUDSPETH COUNTIES). (a) The 205th Judicial District is composed of Culberson, El Paso, and Hudspeth counties.

(b) The 205th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 205th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.385. 206TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 206th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(d), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(4), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.386. 207TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CALDWELL, COMAL, AND HAYS COUNTIES). (a) The 207th Judicial District is composed of Caldwell, Comal, and Hays counties.

(b) The 207th District Court has the same jurisdiction in Comal County as the 22nd District Court has in Comal County and shall give preference to criminal cases in Caldwell, Comal, and Hays counties.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 26, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

(d) The terms of the 207th District Court begin:

(1) in Hays County on the first Mondays in February and August;

(2) in Caldwell County on the first Mondays in March and September; and

(3) in Comal County on the first Mondays in January and July.

(e) Section 24.123, relating to the 22nd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 207th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 26, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 3(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.387. 208TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 208th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 208th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.388. 209TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 209th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 209th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.389. 210TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 210th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 210th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 24.390. 211TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 211th Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.391. 212TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GALVESTON COUNTY). (a) The 212th Judicial District is composed of Galveston County.

(b) Section 24.111, relating to the 10th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 212th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.392. 213TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 213th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 213th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) The terms of the 213th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 213th District Court has concurrent original jurisdiction with the county criminal courts in Tarrant County over misdemeanor cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.002, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.393. 214TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NUECES COUNTY). (a) The 214th Judicial District is composed of Nueces County.

(b) The 214th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 214th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Nueces County to receive a guilty plea in a misdemeanor case pending in a county court at law in Nueces County and dispose of the case, regardless of whether the case is transferred to the district court. The judgment, order, or action of the district court is valid and binding as if the case were pending in the district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 72 (H.B. 2913), Sec. 6, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 24.394. 215TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 215th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 215th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.395. 217TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ANGELINA COUNTY). The 217th Judicial District is composed of Angelina County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.396. 218TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ATASCOSA, FRIO, KARNES, LASALLE, AND WILSON COUNTIES). (a) The 218th Judicial District is composed of Atascosa, Frio, Karnes, LaSalle, and Wilson counties.

(b) The judge of the 218th District Court may impanel grand juries in each county in the district but is not required to impanel a grand jury in any county except when the judge considers it necessary. The judge may alternate the impaneling of grand juries in each county with the judge of any other district court in that county, or the judges may by agreement determine which one of the courts will impanel the grand juries. Indictments within each county may be returned to any district court within that county. All grand and petit juries drawn for one district court in each county are interchangeable with any other district court in that county as if the jury had been drawn for the court in which it is used.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 2150), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.397. 219TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 219th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.398. 220TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BOSQUE, COMANCHE, AND HAMILTON COUNTIES). The 220th Judicial District is composed of Bosque, Comanche, and Hamilton counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.399. 221ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). The 221st Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.400. 222ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DEAF SMITH AND OLDHAM COUNTIES). The 222nd Judicial District is composed of Deaf Smith and Oldham counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.401. 223RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GRAY COUNTY). The 223rd Judicial District is composed of Gray County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.402. 224TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 224th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 224th District Court shall give preference to civil cases.

(c) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to all the district courts in Bexar County. To the extent that this subchapter is inconsistent with those provisions, Section 24.139 prevails.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.403. 225TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 225th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 225th District Court shall give preference to civil cases and to cases and proceedings under Title 2 or 5, Family Code.

(c) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to all the district courts in Bexar County. To the extent that this subchapter is inconsistent with those provisions, Section 24.139 prevails.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 507, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 7.25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.404. 226TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 226th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 226th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1997, 74th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

(d) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to all the district courts in Bexar County. To the extent that this subchapter is inconsistent with those provisions, Section 24.139 prevails.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.405. 227TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 227th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 227th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1997, 74th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

(d) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to all the district courts in Bexar County. To the extent that this subchapter is inconsistent with those provisions, Section 24.139 prevails.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.406. 228TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 228th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 228th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.407. 230TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 230th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 230th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.408. 231ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 231st Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 231st District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.409. 232ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 232nd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 232nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.410. 233RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 233rd Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 233rd District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.411. 234TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 234th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.412. 235TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COOKE COUNTY). The 235th Judicial District is composed of Cooke County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.413. 236TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 236th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 236th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 2454), Sec. 7, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 24.414. 237TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LUBBOCK COUNTY). The 237th Judicial District is composed of Lubbock County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.415. 238TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MIDLAND COUNTY). The 238th Judicial District is composed of Midland County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.416. 239TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZORIA COUNTY). The 239th Judicial District is composed of Brazoria County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.417. 240TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 240th Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.418. 241ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (SMITH COUNTY). The 241st Judicial District is composed of Smith County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.419. 242ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CASTRO, HALE, AND SWISHER COUNTIES). The 242nd Judicial District is composed of Castro, Hale, and Swisher counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.420. 243RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 243rd Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 243rd District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.421. 244TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ECTOR COUNTY). The 244th Judicial District is composed of Ector County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.422. 245TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 245th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 245th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.423. 246TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 246th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 246th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.424. 247TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 247th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 247th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.425. 248TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 248th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 248th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.426. 249TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JOHNSON AND SOMERVELL COUNTIES). The 249th Judicial District is composed of Johnson and Somervell counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.427. 250TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). The 250th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.428. 251ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (POTTER AND RANDALL COUNTIES). (a) The 251st Judicial District is composed of Potter and Randall counties.

(b) The 251st District Court may hear and determine, in any county in the district convenient for the court, all preliminary or interlocutory matters in which a jury may not be demanded, in any case pending in any county in the district regardless of whether the case was filed in the county in which the hearing is held. Unless there is an objection filed by a party to the suit, the 251st District Court may hear, in any county in the district convenient for the court, any nonjury case pending in any county in the district, including divorces, adoptions, default judgments, and matters in which citation was by publication, regardless of whether the case was filed in the county in which the hearing is held.

(c) Section 24.149, relating to the 47th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 251st District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.429. 252ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JEFFERSON COUNTY). (a) The 252nd Judicial District is composed of Jefferson County.

(b) The 252nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) The terms of the 252nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October. Each term continues until the term ends by operation of law or the court has disposed of the business for that term.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.430. 253RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CHAMBERS AND LIBERTY COUNTIES). (a) The 253rd Judicial District is composed of Chambers and Liberty counties.

(b) The terms of the 253rd District Court begin in Liberty County on the first Mondays in April and October and in Chambers County on the first Mondays in June and December.

(c) Section 24.490, relating to the 344th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 253rd District Court in Chambers County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 607 (S.B. 643), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 24.431. 254TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 254th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 254th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.432. 255TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 255th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 255th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.433. 256TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 256th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 256th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.434. 257TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 257th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 257th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.435. 258TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (POLK, SAN JACINTO, AND TRINITY COUNTIES). (a) The 258th Judicial District is composed of Polk, San Jacinto, and Trinity counties.

(b) The 258th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction in Polk County with the county court over all misdemeanor cases over which the county court has jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state. Cases in the concurrent misdemeanor jurisdiction may be filed in either court, and all cases of concurrent misdemeanor jurisdiction may be transferred between the 258th District Court and the county court. A case may not be transferred from one court to another without the consent of the judge of the court to which it is transferred, and a case may not be transferred unless it is within the jurisdiction of the court to which it is transferred.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.436. 259TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JONES AND SHACKELFORD COUNTIES). (a) The 259th Judicial District is composed of Jones and Shackelford counties.

(b) In addition to the jurisdiction prescribed by the constitution and general laws of the state for district courts, the 259th District Court in Jones and Shackelford counties has all original and appellate civil and criminal jurisdiction normally exercised by county courts under the constitution and general laws of this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.437. 260TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ORANGE COUNTY). The 260th Judicial District is composed of Orange County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.438. 261ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). The 261st Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.439. 262ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 262nd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 262nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.440. 263RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 263rd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 263rd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.441. 264TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BELL COUNTY). The 264th Judicial District is composed of Bell County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.442. 265TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 265th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 265th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.443. 266TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ERATH COUNTY). The 266th Judicial District is composed of Erath County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.444. 267TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CALHOUN, DEWITT, GOLIAD, JACKSON, REFUGIO, AND VICTORIA COUNTIES). The 267th Judicial District is composed of Calhoun, DeWitt, Goliad, Jackson, Refugio, and Victoria counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.445. 268TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 268th Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.446. 269TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 269th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.447. 270TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 270th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.448. 271ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JACK AND WISE COUNTIES). The 271st Judicial District is composed of Jack and Wise counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.449. 272ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZOS COUNTY). (a) The 272nd Judicial District is composed of Brazos County.

(b) The 272nd District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the statutory county courts of Brazos County in misdemeanor cases as well as the jurisdiction prescribed by general law for district courts.

(c) The terms of the 272nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in April and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 280, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 24.450. 273RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (SABINE, SAN AUGUSTINE, AND SHELBY COUNTIES). (a) The 273rd Judicial District is composed of Sabine, San Augustine, and Shelby counties.

(b) The jurisdiction of the 273rd District Court is concurrent with the jurisdiction of the other district courts in Sabine, San Augustine, and Shelby counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.451. 274TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COMAL, GUADALUPE, AND HAYS COUNTIES). (a) The 274th Judicial District is composed of Comal, Guadalupe, and Hays counties.

(b) The terms of the 274th District Court begin on the second Tuesdays in February and August in Comal County, on the second Tuesdays in May and November in Guadalupe County, and on the second Tuesdays in June and December in Hays County.

(c) The 274th District Court has the same jurisdiction as the 22nd and the 207th district courts in Comal and Hays counties and concurrent jurisdiction with the 25th and Second 25th district courts in Guadalupe County.

(d) Section 24.123, relating to the 22nd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 274th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 26, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 24.452. 275TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 275th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(e), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(5), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.453. 276TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMP, MARION, MORRIS, AND TITUS COUNTIES). (a) The 276th Judicial District is composed of Camp, Marion, Morris, and Titus counties.

(b) The terms of the 276th District Court begin:

(1) in Marion County on the first Mondays in January, May, and July;

(2) in Morris County on the first Mondays in February, March, and September;

(3) in Titus County on the first Mondays in April, June, and November; and

(4) in Camp County on the first Mondays in October and December.

(c) The jurisdiction of the 276th District Court is concurrent with the jurisdiction of the 115th District Court in Marion County and with the 76th District Court in Camp, Morris, and Titus counties.

(d) The 276th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts in Camp, Marion, and Morris counties over all matters of criminal jurisdiction, original and appellate, in cases over which the particular county court has jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state. In each of the counties, matters and proceedings in the concurrent jurisdiction may be transferred between the 276th District Court and the county court.

(e) Section 24.178, relating to the 76th District Court, has provisions applicable to both that court and the 276th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.454. 277TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WILLIAMSON COUNTY). (a) The 277th Judicial District is composed of Williamson County.

(b) The terms of the 277th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 530, Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 363, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 24.455. 278TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LEON, MADISON, AND WALKER COUNTIES). The 278th Judicial District is composed of Leon, Madison, and Walker counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 9(f), eff. September 1, 2008.

Sec. 24.456. 279TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JEFFERSON COUNTY). (a) The 279th Judicial District is composed of Jefferson County.

(b) The 279th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.457. 280TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 280th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.458. 281ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 281st Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.459. 282ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 282nd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 282nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.460. 283RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 283rd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 283rd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.461. 284TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). The 284th Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.462. 285TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 285th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 285th District Court shall give preference to civil cases.

(c) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to all the district courts in Bexar County. To the extent that this subchapter is inconsistent with those provisions, Section 24.139 prevails.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.463. 286TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COCHRAN AND HOCKLEY COUNTIES). The 286th Judicial District is composed of Cochran and Hockley counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.464. 287TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BAILEY AND PARMER COUNTIES). (a) The 287th Judicial District is composed of Bailey and Parmer counties.

(b) The terms of the 287th District Court begin in Bailey County on the first Mondays in February and August and in Parmer County on the first Mondays in March and September.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.465. 288TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 288th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 288th District Court shall give preference to civil cases.

(c) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to all the district courts in Bexar County. To the extent that this subchapter is inconsistent with those provisions, Section 24.139 prevails.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.466. 289TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 289th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 289th District Court shall give primary preference to juvenile matters under Title 3, Family Code, and secondary preference to criminal cases.

(c) The terms of the 289th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July. Each term continues until the court has disposed of the business for that term.

(d) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to all the district courts in Bexar County. To the extent that this subchapter is inconsistent with those provisions, Section 24.139 prevails.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.13(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 7.26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 165 (H.B. 2936), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 24.467. 290TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 290th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 290th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1997, 74th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

(d) Section 24.139, relating to the 37th District Court, contains provisions applicable to all the district courts in Bexar County. To the extent that this subchapter is inconsistent with those provisions, Section 24.139 prevails.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 497, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.468. 291ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 291st Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 291st District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.469. 292ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 292nd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 292nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.470. 293RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DIMMIT, MAVERICK, AND ZAVALA COUNTIES). The 293rd Judicial District is composed of Dimmit, Maverick, and Zavala counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.471. 294TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (VAN ZANDT COUNTY). (a) The 294th Judicial District is composed of Van Zandt County.

(b) The 294th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county court in Van Zandt County over all matters of civil and criminal jurisdiction, original and appellate, in cases over which the county court has jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state. Matters and proceedings in the concurrent jurisdiction of the 294th District Court and the county court may be filed in either court and all cases of concurrent jurisdiction may be transferred between the 294th District Court and the county court. However, a case may not be transferred from one court to another without the consent of the judge of the court to which it is transferred, and a case may not be transferred unless it is within the jurisdiction of the court to which it is transferred.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.472. 295TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 295th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 295th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.473. 296TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 296th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.474. 297TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 297th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 297th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) The terms of the 297th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 297th District Court has concurrent original jurisdiction with the county criminal courts in Tarrant County over misdemeanor cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 24.475. 298TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 298th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 298th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.476. 299TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). The 299th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.477. 331ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). The 331st Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.478. 332ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 332nd Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(f), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(6), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.479. 333RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 333rd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 333rd District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.480. 334TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 334th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 334th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.481. 335TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BASTROP, BURLESON, LEE, AND WASHINGTON COUNTIES). The 335th Judicial District is composed of Bastrop, Burleson, Lee, and Washington counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.482. 336TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FANNIN COUNTY). The 336th Judicial District is composed of Fannin County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.14(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 610 (H.B. 2174), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 1(e), eff. January 1, 2010.

Sec. 24.483. 337TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 337th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 337th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.484. 338TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 338th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 338th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.485. 339TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 339th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 339th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.486. 340TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TOM GREEN COUNTY). (a) The 340th Judicial District is composed of Tom Green County.

(b) The terms of the 340th District Court begin on the first Mondays in March and September.

(c) Indictments within Tom Green County issued by any district court in the county may be returned to the 340th District Court.

(d) Section 24.153, relating to the 51st District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 340th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.487. 341ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WEBB COUNTY). (a) The 341st Judicial District is composed of Webb County.

(b) The judge of the 341st District Court may impanel grand juries in Webb County. The judge of the 341st District Court may alternate the drawing of grand juries with the judge of any other district court in the county. By order entered on the minutes, for any term that the judge considers it necessary, the judge may order grand and petit juries to be drawn.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 954, Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

(d) A criminal complaint may be presented to the grand jury of any district court in Webb County, and a resulting indictment may be returned to any other district court in Webb County with the appropriate criminal jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 1(b), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 954 (H.B. 4037), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 750 (H.B. 1314), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 2150), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.488. 342ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 342nd Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 342nd District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.489. 343RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ARANSAS, BEE, LIVE OAK, MCMULLEN, AND SAN PATRICIO COUNTIES). (a) The 343rd Judicial District is composed of Aransas, Bee, Live Oak, McMullen, and San Patricio counties.

(b) Section 24.138, relating to the 36th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 343rd District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.490. 344TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CHAMBERS COUNTY). (a) The 344th Judicial District is composed of Chambers County.

(b) The terms of court of the 344th District Court begin on the first Mondays in June and December of each year.

(c) The 344th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction over all matters of civil and criminal jurisdiction, original and appellate, in cases over which the county court has jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state. Matters and proceedings in the concurrent jurisdiction of the 344th District Court and the county court shall be filed in the county court, and all cases of concurrent jurisdiction may be transferred between the 344th District Court and the county court. A case may not be transferred from one court to another without the consent of the judge of the court to which it is transferred, and a case may not be transferred unless it is within the jurisdiction of the court to which it is transferred.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 24.030, a district court in Chambers County may sit in a suitable facility outside the county seat if the facility is designated by the commissioners court as an auxiliary county seat, as provided by Section 292.031, Local Government Code.

(e) A district court in Chambers County sitting in an auxiliary court facility designated by the commissioners court as an auxiliary county seat may hear, in all case types, the motions, arguments, nonjury trials and jury trials, and any other matters before the court within the court's jurisdiction.

(f) The district clerk or the clerk's deputy serves as clerk of the court when a district court sits in a facility designated as an auxiliary county seat and may keep all necessary books, minutes, records, and papers at the facility.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.15(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 607 (S.B. 643), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 24.491. 345TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 345th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 345th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.492. 346TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 346th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) Section 24.136, relating to the 34th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 346th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.493. 347TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NUECES COUNTY). (a) The 347th Judicial District is composed of Nueces County.

(b) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 347th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Nueces County to receive a guilty plea in a misdemeanor case pending in a county court at law in Nueces County and dispose of the case, regardless of whether the case is transferred to the district court. The judgment, order, or action of the district court is valid and binding as if the case were pending in the district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 72 (H.B. 2913), Sec. 7, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 24.494. 348TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 348th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 348th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.495. 349TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ANDERSON AND HOUSTON COUNTIES). The 349th Judicial District is composed of Anderson and Houston counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.496. 350TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TAYLOR COUNTY). The 350th Judicial District is composed of Taylor County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.497. 351ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 351st Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 351st District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.498. 352ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 352nd Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 352nd District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.499. 353RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). The 353rd Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.500. 354TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HUNT AND RAINS COUNTIES). (a) The 354th Judicial District is composed of Hunt and Rains counties.

(b) Section 24.108, relating to the 8th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 354th District Court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1124, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 24.501. 355TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HOOD COUNTY). The 355th Judicial District is composed of Hood County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.502. 356TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARDIN COUNTY). (a) The 356th Judicial District is composed of Hardin County.

(b) The 356th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction over all matters of civil and criminal jurisdiction, original and appellate, in cases over which the county court has jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state. Matters and proceedings in the concurrent jurisdiction of the 356th District Court and the county court may be filed in either court, and all cases of concurrent jurisdiction may be transferred between the 356th District Court and the county court. A case may not be transferred from one court to another without the consent of the judge of the court to which it is transferred, and a case may not be transferred unless it is within the jurisdiction of the court to which it is transferred.

(c) The terms of the 356th District Court begin on the first Mondays in April and October.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.503. 357TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON COUNTY). The 357th Judicial District is composed of Cameron County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 5(d), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.504. 358TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ECTOR COUNTY). The 358th Judicial District is composed of Ector County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.505. 359TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). The 359th Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.506. 361ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZOS COUNTY). (a) The 361st Judicial District is composed of Brazos County.

(b) The 361st District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the statutory county courts of Brazos County in misdemeanor cases as well as the jurisdiction prescribed by general law for district courts.

(c) The terms of the 361st District Court begin on the first Mondays in April and October.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1124, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 16.01(19), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 280, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 24.507. 362ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 362nd Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.508. 363RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). (a) The 363rd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The 363rd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 24.509. 364TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (LUBBOCK COUNTY). The 364th Judicial District is composed of Lubbock County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 24.510. 365TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DIMMIT, MAVERICK, AND ZAVALA COUNTIES). The 365th Judicial District is composed of Dimmit, Maverick, and Zavala counties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 24.511. 366TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 366th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 24.512. 367TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 367th Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 24.513. 368TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WILLIAMSON COUNTY). (a) The 368th Judicial District is composed of Williamson County.

(b) The terms of the 368th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January and July.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 530, Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 363, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 24.514. 369TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ANDERSON, CHEROKEE, AND LEON COUNTIES). The 369th Judicial District is composed of Anderson, Cherokee, and Leon counties.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.01(b), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 24.515. 370TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 370th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(g), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(7), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.516. 371ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 371st Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 371st District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) The terms of the 371st District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 371st District Court has concurrent original jurisdiction with the county criminal courts in Tarrant County over misdemeanor cases.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1990. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.003, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.517. 372ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 372nd Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 372nd District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

(c) The terms of the 372nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 372nd District Court has concurrent original jurisdiction with the county criminal courts in Tarrant County over misdemeanor cases.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1990. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.004, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.522. 377TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (VICTORIA COUNTY). (a) The 377th Judicial District is composed of Victoria County.

(b) The 377th Judicial District shall give preference to criminal cases.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 4(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 24.523. 378TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ELLIS COUNTY). The 378th Judicial District is composed of Ellis County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 24.524. 379TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). The 379th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.525. 380TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). (a) The 380th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.13(13), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1996.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.13(13), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.526. 381ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (STARR COUNTY). (a) The 381st Judicial District is composed of Starr County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.13(14), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.13(14), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.527. 382ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ROCKWALL COUNTY). (a) The 382nd Judicial District is composed of Rockwall County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.13(15), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.13(15), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.528. 383RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 383rd Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.13(16), eff. January 1, 2012.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.13(16), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.13(16), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.529. 384TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 384th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.13(17), eff. January 1, 2012.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.13(17), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 79), Sec. 3.13(17), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 24.530. 385TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MIDLAND COUNTY). The 385th Judicial District is composed of Midland County.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1032, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1995.

Sec. 24.531. 386TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 386th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 386th District Court shall give preference to juvenile matters under Title 3, Family Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 165 (H.B. 2936), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 24.532. 387TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). (a) The 387th Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County.

(b) The 387th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 2(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.533. 388TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). (a) The 388th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

(b) The 388th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.534. 389TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 389th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541, Sec. 2(8), eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(h), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 4(b), eff. January 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(8), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.535. 390TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 390th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 390th District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 5, eff. Oct. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.536. 391ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TOM GREEN COUNTY). (a) The 391st Judicial District is composed of Tom Green County.

(b) The terms of the 391st District Court begin on the first Mondays in March and September.

(c) Indictments within Tom Green County issued by any district court in the county may be returned to the 391st District Court.

(d) Section 24.153, relating to the 51st District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 391st District Court.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 5, eff. Oct. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.537. 392ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HENDERSON COUNTY). (a) The 392nd Judicial District is composed of Henderson County.

(b) A judge of the 392nd Judicial District may not be assigned under Chapter 74 to serve as a visiting judge in Bexar, Dallas, Ector, Fort Bend, Harris, Jefferson, Lubbock, Midland, Tarrant, or Travis County.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

Sec. 24.538. 393RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). (a) The 393rd Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

(b) The 393rd District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.539. 394TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BREWSTER, CULBERSON, HUDSPETH, JEFF DAVIS, AND PRESIDIO COUNTIES). (a) The 394th Judicial District is composed of Brewster, Culberson, Hudspeth, Jeff Davis, and Presidio counties.

(b) The terms of the 394th District Court begin:

(1) in Brewster County on the first Monday in March and the third Monday in September;

(2) in Culberson County on the third Monday in October and the first Monday in April;

(3) in Hudspeth County on the third Monday in March and the first Monday in September;

(4) in Jeff Davis County on the second Mondays in January and July; and

(5) in Presidio County on the third Monday after the first Mondays in January and July.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 780, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 780, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 24.540. 395TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WILLIAMSON COUNTY). The 395th Judicial District is composed of Williamson County.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.541. 396TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 396th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 396th District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

(c) The terms of the 396th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 396th District Court has concurrent original jurisdiction with the county criminal courts and the justice courts in Tarrant County over misdemeanor cases.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2000. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 75 (S.B. 321), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.005, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.542. 397TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GRAYSON COUNTY). The 397th Judicial District is composed of Grayson County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 1, eff. September 15, 2008.

Sec. 24.543. 398TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 398th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541, Sec. 2(9), eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 4(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 2(i), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 4(b), eff. January 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(9), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.544. 399TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 399th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 399th District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.545. 400TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 400th Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 11(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.546. 401ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 401st Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.547. 402ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WOOD COUNTY). (a) The 402nd Judicial District is composed of Wood County.

(b) The 402nd District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county court in Wood County over all matters of civil and criminal jurisdiction, original and appellate, in cases over which the county court has jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state. Matters and proceedings in the concurrent jurisdiction of the 402nd District Court and the county court may be filed in either court and all cases of concurrent jurisdiction may be transferred between the 402nd District Court and the county court. However, a case may not be transferred from one court to another without the consent of the judge of the court to which it is transferred, and a case may not be transferred unless it is within the jurisdiction of the court to which it is transferred.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 24.548. 403RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 403rd Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 403rd District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 14, eff. Dec. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.549. 404TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON COUNTY). The 404th Judicial District is composed of Cameron County.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 15, eff. Jan. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 810, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 5(e), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.550. 405TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GALVESTON COUNTY). The 405th Judicial District is composed of Galveston County.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 15, eff. Jan. 1, 2001.

Sec. 24.551. 406TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WEBB COUNTY). (a) The 406th Judicial District is composed of Webb County.

(b) The 406th District Court shall give preference to cases involving family violence, cases under the Family Code, and cases under the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The 406th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the other district courts in Webb County.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 406th District Court has the:

(1) criminal jurisdiction of a county court; and

(2) civil jurisdiction of a county court in all cases under the Family Code or the Health and Safety Code.

(e) The terms of the 406th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October. Each term continues until the court disposes of its business.

(f) A criminal complaint may be presented to the grand jury of any district court in Webb County, and a resulting indictment may be returned to any other district court in Webb County with the appropriate criminal jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 15, eff. Jan. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 1(c), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.552. 407TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). The 407th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.553. 411TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (POLK, SAN JACINTO, AND TRINITY COUNTIES). (a) The 411th Judicial District is composed of Polk, San Jacinto, and Trinity counties.

(b) A judge of the 411th Judicial District may not be assigned under Chapter 74 to serve as a visiting judge in Bexar, Dallas, Ector, Fort Bend, Harris, Jefferson, Lubbock, Midland, Tarrant, or Travis County.

(c) The 411th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction in Polk County with the county court over all misdemeanor cases over which the county court has jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state. Cases in the concurrent misdemeanor jurisdiction may be filed in either court, and all cases of concurrent misdemeanor jurisdiction may be transferred between the 411th District Court and the county court. A case may not be transferred from one court to another without the consent of the judge of the court to which it is transferred, and a case may not be transferred unless it is within the jurisdiction of the court to which it is transferred.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.006(a), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.554. 408TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 408th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 408th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 8, eff. Jan. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.555. 409TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). The 409th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2000.

Sec. 24.556. 412TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZORIA COUNTY). The 412th Judicial District is composed of Brazoria County.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 6(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.557. 413TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JOHNSON COUNTY). The 413th Judicial District is composed of Johnson County.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 24.558. 414TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MCLENNAN COUNTY). (a) The 414th Judicial District is composed of McLennan County.

(b) The 414th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county court and the statutory county courts of McLennan County in misdemeanor cases as well as the jurisdiction prescribed by general law for district courts.

(c) The terms of the 414th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, March, May, July, September, and November.

(d) Section 24.120, relating to the 19th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 414th District Court.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 848 (S.B. 2230), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 24.559. 415TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (PARKER COUNTY). The 415th Judicial District is composed of Parker County.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 3(a), eff. Jan. 15, 2004.

Sec. 24.560. 416TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 416th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 24.561. 417TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). (a) The 417th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

(b) The 417th District Court shall give preference to juvenile matters.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 15, 2004.

Sec. 24.562. 418TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). (a) The 418th Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County.

(b) The 418th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 2(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.563. 419TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY).

The 419th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.564. 420TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NACOGDOCHES COUNTY). The 420th Judicial District is composed of Nacogdoches County.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 7, eff. Jan. 15, 2004.

Sec. 24.565. 421ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CALDWELL COUNTY). The 421st Judicial District is composed of Caldwell County.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 8, eff. Jan. 15, 2004.

Sec. 24.566. 422ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (KAUFMAN COUNTY). The 422nd Judicial District is composed of Kaufman County.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 9, eff. Jan. 15, 2004.

Sec. 24.567. 423RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BASTROP COUNTY). The 423rd Judicial District is composed of Bastrop County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 3(a), eff. October 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.568. 424TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BLANCO, BURNET, LLANO, AND SAN SABA COUNTIES). (a) The 424th Judicial District is composed of Blanco, Burnet, Llano, and San Saba Counties.

(b) The jurisdiction of the 424th District Court is concurrent with the jurisdiction of the 33rd District Court.

(c) The 424th District Court has the same terms of court as the 33rd District Court.

(d) The judge of the 424th District Court may impanel grand juries in each county. The judge of the 424th District Court may alternate the drawing of grand juries with the judge of any other district court in each county within the 424th Judicial District and may order grand and petit juries to be drawn for any term of the court as the judge determines is necessary, by an order entered in the minutes of the court. Indictments within each county may be returned to either court within that county.

(e) The 424th District Court may hear and determine, in any county in the district convenient for the court, all preliminary or interlocutory matters in which a jury may not be demanded, in any case pending in any county in the district regardless of whether the case was filed in the county in which the hearing is held. Unless an objection is filed by a party to the suit, the 424th District Court may hear, in any county in the district convenient for the court, any nonjury case pending in any county in the district, including divorces, adoptions, default judgments, and matters in which citation was by publication, regardless of whether the case was filed in the county in which the hearing is held.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 15(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 2150), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.569. 425TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WILLIAMSON COUNTY). The 425th Judicial District is composed of Williamson County.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 7(a), eff. January 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.570. 426TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BELL COUNTY). (a) The 426th Judicial District is composed of Bell County.

(b) The terms of the 426th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.129, relating to the 27th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 426th District Court.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 8(a), eff. January 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.571. 427TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 427th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 427th Judicial District shall give preference to criminal matters.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 9(a), eff. January 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.572. 428TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HAYS COUNTY). The 428th Judicial District is composed of Hays County.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 10(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.573. 429TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 429th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 4(a), eff. January 1, 2009.

Sec. 24.574. 430TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 430th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) The 430th District Court shall give preference to family violence and criminal matters.

(c) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 4(a), eff. January 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 541 (S.B. 1575), Sec. 2(10), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.575. 431ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 431st Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 2(a), eff. January 1, 2011.

Sec. 24.576. 432ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 432nd Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 432nd District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

(c) The terms of the 432nd District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 432nd District Court has concurrent original jurisdiction with the county criminal courts in Tarrant County over misdemeanor cases.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 3(a), eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.007, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.577. 433RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COMAL COUNTY). The 433rd Judicial District is composed of Comal County.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 11(a), eff. January 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.578. 434TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 434th Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 12(a), eff. January 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.579. 435TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). (a) The 435th Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 , Sec. 39(1), eff. June 17, 2015.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law and only to the extent that the duties of those individuals relate to civil commitment proceedings under Chapter 841, Health and Safety Code, or to criminal cases involving offenses under Section 841.085, Health and Safety Code, and Article 62.203, Code of Criminal Procedure, the state shall pay the salaries of and other expenses related to the court reporter appointed for the 435th District Court under Section 52.041 and the court coordinator appointed for the court under Section 74.101. The salaries of the court reporter and court coordinator shall be set in amounts commensurate with the salaries paid by other district courts for those positions.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 5(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (S.B. 746), Sec. 33, eff. June 17, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (S.B. 746), Sec. 39(1), eff. June 17, 2015.

Sec. 24.580. 436TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 436th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 436th District Court shall give preference to juvenile matters under Title 3, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 4(a), eff. October 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 165 (H.B. 2936), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 24.581. 437TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 437th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 437th District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 5(a), eff. December 15, 2009.

Sec. 24.582. 438TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BEXAR COUNTY). (a) The 438th Judicial District is composed of Bexar County.

(b) The 438th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 6(a), eff. September 1, 2010.

Sec. 24.583. 439TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ROCKWALL COUNTY). The 439th Judicial District is composed of Rockwall County.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 7(a), eff. November 1, 2010.

Sec. 24.584. 440TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CORYELL COUNTY). The 440th Judicial District is composed of Coryell County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.03(a), eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.585. 441ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MIDLAND COUNTY). The 441st Judicial District is composed of Midland County.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 8(a), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 24.586. 442ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 442nd Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.04(a), eff. January 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.587. 443RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ELLIS COUNTY). The 443rd Judicial District is composed of Ellis County.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.05(a), eff. September 1, 2014.

Sec. 24.589. 445TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON COUNTY). (a) The 445th Judicial District is composed of Cameron County.

(b) The 445th District Court shall give preference to criminal law cases.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 6(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.590. 446TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (ECTOR COUNTY). The 446th Judicial District is composed of Ector County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.04(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.591. 451ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (KENDALL COUNTY). (a) The 451st Judicial District is composed of Kendall County.

(b) In addition to the other jurisdiction provided by law, the 451st District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the County Court of Kendall County in all civil and criminal matters over which the county court would have original or appellate jurisdiction, including probate matters and proceedings under Subtitle C, Title 7, Health and Safety Code.

(c) All civil and criminal matters within the concurrent jurisdiction of the county and district courts must be filed with the county clerk in the county court. The county clerk serves as the clerk of the district court for those matters.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 24.030, a district court in Kendall County may sit outside the county seat in a suitable facility designated by the Kendall County Commissioners Court as an auxiliary court facility, as provided by Section 292.031, Local Government Code.

(e) A district court in Kendall County sitting in an auxiliary court facility designated by the Kendall County Commissioners Court may hear motions, arguments, nonjury trials, and jury trials for all actions and any other matter before the court and within the court's jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.02(b), eff. January 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.008, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.592. 448TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). The 448th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 7(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.593. 449TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). (a) The 449th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

(b) The 449th District Court shall give preference to juvenile matters.

(c) A party in a criminal case before the court may electronically file any required court document. The court shall implement the statewide electronic court filing system to assist a party in electronic filing.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 8(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (H.B. 349), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.594. 450TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 450th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 450th District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.06(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.596. 452ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EDWARDS, KIMBLE, MCCULLOCH, MASON, AND MENARD COUNTIES). (a) The 452nd Judicial District is composed of Edwards, Kimble, McCulloch, Mason, and Menard Counties.

(b) The judge of the 452nd District Court may impanel grand juries in each county. The judge of the 452nd District Court may order grand and petit juries to be drawn for any term of the judge's court as in the judge's judgment is necessary, by an order entered in the minutes of the court.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.03(c), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 929 (H.B. 2150), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.597. 453RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HAYS COUNTY). The 453rd Judicial District is composed of Hays County.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 2.01(a), eff. September 1, 2018.

Sec. 24.598. 454TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MEDINA COUNTY). The 454th Judicial District is composed of Medina County.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.03(b), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.599. 455TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 455th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 455th District Court shall give preference to civil and family law matters.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.04(a), eff. October 1, 2020.

Sec. 24.5995. 506TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GRIMES AND WALLER COUNTIES). The 506th Judicial District is composed of Grimes and Waller Counties.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 9(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.600. 456TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GUADALUPE COUNTY). (a) The 456th Judicial District is composed of Guadalupe County.

(b) The 456th District Court shall give preference to civil cases.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.05(a), eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 24.6001. 457TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MONTGOMERY COUNTY). The 457th Judicial District is composed of Montgomery County.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.06(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.6002. 458TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 458th Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 2.02(a), eff. September 1, 2017.

Text of section effective on January 01, 2025

Sec. 24.600201. 477TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 477th Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.009(a), eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 24.60022. 478TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BELL COUNTY). (a) The 478th Judicial District is composed of Bell County.

(b) The terms of the 478th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.129, relating to the 27th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the 478th District Court.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.01(b), eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 24.60025. 480TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WILLIAMSON COUNTY). The 480th Judicial District is composed of Williamson County.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.04(a), eff. October 1, 2022.

Sec. 24.60026. 481ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 481st Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.05(a), eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 24.60027. 482ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 482nd Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.02(a), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 24.60028. 483RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HAYS COUNTY). The 483rd Judicial District is composed of Hays County.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.06(a), eff. September 1, 2022.

Sec. 24.60029. 484TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON COUNTY). (a) The 484th Judicial District is composed of Cameron County.

(b) The 484th District Court shall give preference to juvenile matters under Title 3, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.07(a), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 24.6003. 459TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 459th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 459th District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 2.03(a), eff. October 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.60030. 485TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). (a) The 485th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) The 485th District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

(c) The terms of the 485th District Court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(d) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 485th District Court has concurrent original jurisdiction with the county criminal courts in Tarrant County over misdemeanor cases.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.03(a), eff. January 1, 2022.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.010, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.60031. 486TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 486th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 486th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.011(a), eff. October 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.60032. 487TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 487th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 487th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.011(a), eff. October 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.60033. 488TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 488th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 488th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.011(a), eff. October 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.60034. 489TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (KAUFMAN COUNTY). The 489th Judicial District is composed of Kaufman County.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.012(a), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.60038. 493RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). (a) The 493rd Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

(b) The 493rd District Court shall give preference to civil cases.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.013(a), eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section effective on September 01, 2024

Sec. 24.60039. 494TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). (a) The 494th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

(b) The 494th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.014(a), eff. September 1, 2024.

Sec. 24.6004. 460TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TRAVIS COUNTY). (a) The 460th Judicial District is composed of Travis County.

(b) The 460th District Court shall give preference to criminal matters.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 2.04(a), eff. October 1, 2019.

Text of section effective on October 01, 2024

Sec. 24.60040. 495TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 495th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 495th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.015(a), eff. October 1, 2024.

Text of section effective on October 01, 2024

Sec. 24.60041. 496TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 496th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 496th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.015(a), eff. October 1, 2024.

Text of section effective on October 01, 2024

Sec. 24.60042. 497TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). (a) The 497th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

(b) The 497th District Court shall give preference to criminal cases.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.015(a), eff. October 1, 2024.

Text of section effective on October 01, 2025

Sec. 24.60043. 498TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (KENDALL COUNTY). (a) The 498th Judicial District is composed of Kendall County.

(b) This section applies to all district courts in Kendall County.

(c) In addition to the other jurisdiction provided by law, the 498th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the other district courts in Kendall County and with the County Court of Kendall County in all civil and criminal matters over which the county court has original or appellate jurisdiction, including probate matters and proceedings under Subtitle C, Title 7, Health and Safety Code.

(d) All civil and criminal matters within the concurrent jurisdiction of the county and district courts must be filed with the county clerk in the county court. The county clerk serves as the clerk of the district court for those matters.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 24.030, a district court in Kendall County may sit outside the county seat in a suitable facility designated by the Kendall County Commissioners Court as an auxiliary court facility, as provided by Section 292.031, Local Government Code.

(f) A district court in Kendall County sitting in an auxiliary court facility designated by the Kendall County Commissioners Court may hear motions, arguments, nonjury trials, and jury trials for all actions and any other matter before the court and within the court's jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.016(a), eff. October 1, 2025.

Sec. 24.6005. 461ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZORIA COUNTY). (a) The 461st Judicial District is composed of Brazoria County.

(b) The 461st District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.02(c), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.6006. 462ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 462nd Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 2.05(a), eff. January 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.6008. 464TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). The 464th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 912 (S.B. 1329), Sec. 2.06(a), eff. January 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.6009. 465TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BASTROP COUNTY). The 465th Judicial District is composed of Bastrop County.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.017(a), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.60091. 466TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COMAL COUNTY). The 466th Judicial District is composed of Comal County.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.07(a), eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 24.60092. 467TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DENTON COUNTY). The 467th Judicial District is composed of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.08(a), eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 24.60093. 468TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). (a) The 468th Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

(b) The 468th District Court shall give preference to family law matters.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.09(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.60094. 471ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). (a) The 471st Judicial District is composed of Collin County.

(b) The 471st District Court shall give preference to civil matters.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 1.09(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 24.60095. 472ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZOS COUNTY). (a) The 472nd Judicial District is composed of Brazos County.

(b) The 472nd District Court has primary responsibility for cases involving civil matters, family law matters, and juvenile matters.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.018(a), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.60097. 474TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MCLENNAN COUNTY). The 474th Judicial District is composed of McLennan County.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.08(b), eff. October 1, 2022.

Sec. 24.60098. 475TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (SMITH COUNTY). The 475th Judicial District is composed of Smith County.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.09(a), eff. January 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.60099. 476TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HIDALGO COUNTY). The 476th Judicial District is composed of Hidalgo County.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 1.10(a), eff. September 1, 2022.

SUBCHAPTER D. FAMILY DISTRICT COURTS

Sec. 24.601. JURISDICTION. (a) A family district court has the jurisdiction and power provided for district courts by the constitution and laws of this state. Its jurisdiction is concurrent with that of other district courts in the county in which it is located.

(b) A family district court has primary responsibility for cases involving family law matters. These matters include:

(1) adoptions;

(2) birth records;

(3) divorce and marriage annulment;

(4) child welfare, custody, support and reciprocal support, dependency, neglect, and delinquency;

(5) parent and child; and

(6) husband and wife.

(c) This subchapter does not limit the jurisdiction of other district courts nor relieve them of responsibility for handling cases involving family law matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.602. TERMS. Except as provided by Section 24.012, the terms of a family district court begin on the first Monday in January and the first Monday in July.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1082 (H.B. 3481), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 24.603. JUDGE. (a) A family district court judge's qualifications and term of office are the same as those prescribed by the constitution and laws of this state for district judges. A family district court judge is elected in the same manner as a district judge.

(b) A family district court judge is entitled to the same compensation and allowances provided by the state and county for the other district judges in his county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.604. APPOINTMENT OF RETIRED JUDGE TO SIT FOR REGULAR JUDGE. (a) If the regular judge of a family district court is absent or is for any cause disabled or disqualified from presiding, a retired judge of a special juvenile court or a domestic relations court may be appointed by the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region in which the appointed judge resides to sit for the absent, disabled, or disqualified judge of a family district court within the geographic limits of the respective administrative judicial region. To be eligible for the appointment, the retired judge must have voluntarily retired from office and must certify his willingness to serve.

(b) When the docket of a family district court becomes so excessive that the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region in which that court is located considers it an emergency, a retired judge of a special juvenile court or a domestic relations court residing within the geographic limits of the respective administrative judicial region, who meets the qualifications set out in Subsection (a), may be appointed by the presiding judge to sit for the regular judge as long as the emergency exists.

(c) A presiding judge may, with the consent of a retired judge of a special juvenile court or a domestic relations court within his district, make an assignment outside his judicial district with the specific authorization of the presiding judge of the district in which that assignment is made.

(d) A retired judge appointed to sit for a regular judge under this section shall execute the bond and take the oath of office that is required by law for the regular judge for whom he is sitting.

(e) A retired judge appointed under this section has all the power and jurisdiction of the court and the regular judge for whom he is sitting and may sign orders, judgments, decrees, or other process of any kind as presiding judge when acting for the regular judge.

(f) A retired judge appointed to sit for the regular judge under this section shall receive for the services actually performed the same salary that the regular judge is entitled to receive for those services. The amount to be paid for the services shall be paid in the same manner as the regular judge is paid on certification by the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region that the retired judge has rendered the services and is entitled to receive the salary. The payment shall be made from the item in the judiciary section, comptroller's department, of the appropriations act providing for payment of salaries of district judges and criminal district judges. This section does not entitle the retired judge of a special juvenile court or a domestic relations court to participate in the Judicial Retirement System of Texas Plan One or the Judicial Retirement System of Texas Plan Two. None of the salary paid to a retired judge sitting for the regular judge may be deducted or paid out of the salary of the regular judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.18(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 8.44(3), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 24.605. COURT OFFICIALS, PERSONNEL, AND FACILITIES. (a) The prosecuting attorney, the sheriff, and the district clerk shall serve each family district court in their county in the same manner they serve the district courts of their county.

(b) The commissioners court of the county in which a family district court is located shall provide the physical facilities and the deputy clerks, bailiffs, and other personnel necessary to operate the family district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.606. COUNTY JUVENILE BOARD. When a family district court is created in a county, the county's juvenile board composition and the additional compensation of the board members is as provided by Article 5139.2, Revised Statutes.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.607. COURT STYLE. A district court for a judicial district listed in this chapter is a family district court and may be called the "Family District Court for the (number of district) Judicial District."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.608. 300TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (BRAZORIA COUNTY). The 300th Judicial District is composed of Brazoria County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.609. 301ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 301st Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.610. 302ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 302nd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.611. 303RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 303rd Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.612. 304TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 304th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.613. 305TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 305th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.614. 306TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GALVESTON COUNTY). (a) The 306th Judicial District is composed of Galveston County.

(b) All juvenile matters and proceedings in Galveston County shall be filed originally with the district clerk on the docket of the 306th District Court.

(c), (d) Repealed by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 635, Sec. 3(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 635, Sec. 3(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.615. 307TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (GREGG COUNTY). The 307th Judicial District is composed of Gregg County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.616. 308TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 308th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.617. 309TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 309th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.618. 310TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 310th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.619. 311TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 311th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.620. 312TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 312th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.621. 313TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 313th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.622. 314TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 314th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.623. 315TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 315th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.624. 316TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HUTCHINSON COUNTY). The 316th Judicial District is composed of Hutchinson County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.625. 317TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (JEFFERSON COUNTY). The 317th Judicial District is composed of Jefferson County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.626. 318TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (MIDLAND COUNTY). The 318th Judicial District is composed of Midland County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.627. 319TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (NUECES COUNTY). (a) The 319th Judicial District is composed of Nueces County.

(b) The terms of the 319th District Court begin on the first Mondays in April and in October.

(c) In addition to other jurisdiction provided by law, the 319th District Court has concurrent jurisdiction with the county courts at law in Nueces County to receive a guilty plea in a misdemeanor case pending in a county court at law in Nueces County and dispose of the case, regardless of whether the case is transferred to the district court. The judgment, order, or action of the district court is valid and binding as if the case were pending in the district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 286, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 72 (H.B. 2913), Sec. 8, eff. May 17, 2005.

Sec. 24.628. 320TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (POTTER COUNTY). The 320th Judicial District is composed of Potter County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.629. 321ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (SMITH COUNTY). The 321st Judicial District is composed of Smith County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.630. 322ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). The 322nd Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.631. 323RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). The 323rd Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.632. 324TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). The 324th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.633. 325TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). The 325th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.634. 326TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TAYLOR COUNTY). The 326th Judicial District is composed of Taylor County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.635. 65TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (EL PASO COUNTY). The 65th Judicial District is composed of El Paso County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 317, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1996.

Sec. 24.636. 328TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 328th Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.637. 329TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (WHARTON COUNTY). (a) The 329th Judicial District is composed of Wharton County.

(b) Section 24.124, relating to the 23rd District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Family District Court for the 329th Judicial District.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 196, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 24.638. 330TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (DALLAS COUNTY). The 330th Judicial District is composed of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.639. 360TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (TARRANT COUNTY). The 360th Judicial District is composed of Tarrant County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.640. 444TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (CAMERON COUNTY). The 444th Judicial District is composed of Cameron County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 10(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.641. 507TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (HARRIS COUNTY). The 507th Judicial District is composed of Harris County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.05(a), eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 24.642. 469TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 469th Judicial District is composed of Collin County. The 469th District Court shall hear family law matters.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.06(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.643. 470TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (COLLIN COUNTY). The 470th Judicial District is composed of Collin County. The 470th District Court shall hear family law matters.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.06(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 24.644. 505TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 505th Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.07(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. CRIMINAL DISTRICT COURTS

Sec. 24.901. CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT OF DALLAS COUNTY. (a) The Criminal Judicial District of Dallas County is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the criminal district court begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) The criminal district courts in Dallas County have concurrent original misdemeanor jurisdiction with the county courts in Dallas County that have criminal jurisdiction.

(d) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Criminal District Court of Dallas County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.902. DALLAS COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 2. (a) The Dallas County Criminal Judicial District No. 2 is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the criminal district court no. 2 begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.901, relating to the Criminal District Court of Dallas County, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 2.

(d) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 2.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.903. DALLAS COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 3. (a) The Dallas County Criminal Judicial District No. 3 is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the criminal district court no. 3 begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.901, relating to the Criminal District Court of Dallas County, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 3.

(d) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 3.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.904. DALLAS COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 4. (a) The Dallas County Criminal Judicial District No. 4 is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the criminal district court no. 4 begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.901, relating to the Criminal District Court of Dallas County, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 4.

(d) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 4.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.905. DALLAS COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 5. (a) The Dallas County Criminal Judicial District No. 5 is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the criminal district court no. 5 begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.901, relating to the Criminal District Court of Dallas County, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 5.

(d) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 5.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 24.906. DALLAS COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 6. (a) The Dallas County Criminal Judicial District No. 6 is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the criminal district court no. 6 begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.901, relating to the Criminal District Court of Dallas County, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 6.

(d) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 6.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 13(b), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.907. DALLAS COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 7. (a) The Dallas County Criminal Judicial District No. 7 is composed of Dallas County.

(b) The terms of the criminal district court no. 7 begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(c) Section 24.901, relating to the Criminal District Court of Dallas County, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 7.

(d) Section 24.115, relating to the 14th District Court, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Dallas County Criminal District Court No. 7.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 1189), Sec. 13(b), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 24.908. EL PASO COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 1. (a) The El Paso County Criminal Judicial District No. 1 is composed of El Paso County.

(b) The El Paso County Criminal District Court No. 1 shall give primary preference to felony drug cases and associated civil cases emanating from those felony drug cases. The criminal district court shall give secondary preference to other criminal cases and associated civil cases emanating from those criminal cases.

(c) The terms of the El Paso County Criminal District Court No. 1 begin on the third Mondays in April and September and the first Mondays in January, July, and November.

(d) The El Paso County Criminal District Court No. 1 shall have a seal similar to the seal of a district court with "El Paso County Criminal District Court No. 1" engraved on the seal.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 11(a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 24.910. TARRANT COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 1. (a) The Tarrant County Criminal Judicial District No. 1 is composed of Tarrant County.

(a-1) Subchapter C applies to the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 1.

(b) This section applies to the Tarrant County Criminal District Courts Nos. 1, 2, 3, and 4.

(c) The criminal district courts have jurisdiction of criminal cases within the jurisdiction of a district court. The criminal district courts also have concurrent original jurisdiction with the county criminal courts in Tarrant County over misdemeanor cases. The criminal district courts do not have appellate misdemeanor jurisdiction.

(d) The terms of the criminal district courts begin on the first Mondays in January, April, July, and October.

(e) The judge of each criminal district court or county criminal court may, on motion of the judge or the criminal district attorney, transfer misdemeanor cases between the courts by an order entered in the minutes of the transferor court. The clerk of the transferor court shall certify the style and number of the case to the clerk of the transferee court and include the papers of the case with the certification. The clerk of the transferee court shall promptly docket the transferred case. The transferee court shall dispose of the case as if it had been originally instituted in that court.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.019(b), eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.019(a), eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.019(b), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.911. TARRANT COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 2. (a) The Tarrant County Criminal Judicial District No. 2 is composed of Tarrant County.

(a-1) Subchapter C applies to the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 2.

(b) Section 24.910, relating to the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 1, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 2.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.020, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.912. TARRANT COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 3. (a) The Tarrant County Criminal Judicial District No. 3 is composed of Tarrant County.

(a-1) Subchapter C applies to the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 3.

(b) Section 24.910, relating to the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 1, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 3.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.021, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.913. TARRANT COUNTY CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT NO. 4. (a) The Tarrant County Criminal Judicial District No. 4 is composed of Tarrant County.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.022(c), eff. September 1, 2023.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.022(c), eff. September 1, 2023.

(d) Subchapter C applies to the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 4.

(d-1) Section 24.910, relating to the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 1, contains provisions applicable to both that court and the Tarrant County Criminal District Court No. 4.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.022(c), eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 21, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.022(a), eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.022(b), eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 861 (H.B. 3474), Sec. 1.022(c), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 24.920. CRIMINAL JUDICIAL DISTRICT OF JEFFERSON COUNTY. (a) The Criminal Judicial District of Jefferson County is composed of Jefferson County.

(b) The terms of the criminal district court begin on the first Mondays in April, July, October, and January.

(c) The criminal district court has:

(1) original jurisdiction of criminal cases within the jurisdiction of a district court;

(2) concurrent original and appellate jurisdiction with the county courts at law of misdemeanor cases normally within the exclusive jurisdiction of the county courts at law; and

(3) civil jurisdiction in cases of:

(A) divorce, as provided by Chapter 3, Family Code;

(B) dependent and delinquent children, as provided by Section 23.001, by the Family Code, and by Title 43, Revised Statutes;

(C) adoption, as provided by the Family Code; and

(D) habeas corpus proceedings.

(d) The judge of the criminal district court or of a county court at law may, on motion of the judge or the criminal district attorney, transfer misdemeanor cases between the courts by an order entered in the minutes of the transferring court. The clerk of the transferring court shall certify the style and number of the case to the clerk of the receiving court and include the papers of the case with the certification. The receiving clerk shall promptly docket the transferred case. The receiving court shall dispose of the case as if it had been originally instituted in that court.

(e) The court shall have a seal similar to the seal of a district court with "Criminal District Court of Jefferson County" engraved on the seal.

(f) The court may sit at the City of Port Arthur in addition to Beaumont to try, hear, and determine nonjury civil cases and to hear and determine motions, arguments, and the other nonjury civil matters that are within the court's jurisdiction. The district clerk or the clerk's deputy serves as clerk of the court when it sits in Port Arthur and may transfer all necessary books, minutes, records, and papers to Port Arthur while the court is in session there, and transfer them from Port Arthur to Beaumont at the end of each session in Port Arthur. The Commissioners Court of Jefferson County may provide suitable quarters for the court in the subcourthouse while it sits in Port Arthur. The Jefferson County sheriff or the sheriff's deputy shall attend the court in Port Arthur and perform all required duties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER F. REAPPORTIONMENT OF JUDICIAL DISTRICTS

Sec. 24.941. DECLARATION OF POLICY. It is the policy of the state that the administration of justice shall be prompt and efficient and that, for this purpose, the judicial districts of the state shall be reapportioned as provided by this subchapter so that the district courts of various judicial districts have judicial burdens that are as nearly equal as possible.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.942. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Board" means the Judicial Districts Board established by Article V, Section 7a, of the Texas Constitution.

(2) "Reapportionment" means the redistribution of the judicial districts of the state by designating the county or counties to be included in each judicial district and may affect any or all of the judicial districts and counties of the state under either the original reapportionment made under this subchapter or a reapportionment at a time subsequent to an original reapportionment.

(3) "Reapportionment order" means an order adopted by the board that reapportions the judicial districts of the state.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.943. OFFICIAL DUTY. Service on the board is an official duty of each of the officers named in Article V, Section 7a, of the Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.944. DUTIES. The board shall reapportion the judicial districts authorized by Article V, Section 7, of the Texas Constitution by statewide reapportionment of the districts and, as the necessity for additional reapportionment appears, by redesignating, in one or more reapportionment orders, the county or counties that comprise the specific judicial districts affected by those reapportionment orders. The board shall investigate from time to time the necessity of and appropriate locations for new judicial districts and shall advise the legislature of its findings. The board shall inform itself on all matters bearing on its duties.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.945. RULES AND CONDITIONS FOR REAPPORTIONMENT. (a) The reapportionment of the judicial districts of the state by the board is subject to the rules and conditions provided by Subsections (b)-(d).

(b) Reapportionment of the judicial districts shall be made on a determination of fact by the board that the reapportionment will best promote the efficiency and promptness of the administration of justice in the state by equalizing as nearly as possible the judicial burdens of the district courts of the various judicial districts. In determining the reapportionment that best promotes the efficiency and promptness of the administration of justice, the board shall consider:

(1) the numbers and types of cases filed in the district courts of the counties to be affected by the reapportionment;

(2) the numbers and types of cases disposed of by dismissal or judgment in the district courts of those counties;

(3) the numbers and types of cases pending in the district courts of those counties;

(4) the number of district courts in those counties;

(5) the population of the counties;

(6) the area to be covered by a judicial district; and

(7) the actual growth or decline of population and district court case load in the counties to be affected.

(c) Each judicial district affected by a reapportionment must contain one or more complete counties except as provided by this section. More than one judicial district may contain the same county or counties. If more than one county is contained in a judicial district, the territory of the judicial district must be contiguous.

(d) Subject to the other rules and conditions in this section, a judicial district in a reapportionment under this subchapter may:

(1) be enlarged in territory by including an additional county or counties in the district, but a county having a population as large or larger than the population of the judicial district being reapportioned may not be added to the judicial district;

(2) be decreased in territory by removing a county or counties from the district;

(3) have both a county or counties added to the district and a county or counties removed from it; or

(4) be removed to another location in the state so that the district contains an entirely different county or counties.

(e) The legislature, the Judicial Districts Board, or the Legislative Redistricting Board may not redistrict the judicial districts to provide for any judicial district smaller in size than an entire county except as provided by this subsection. Judicial districts smaller in size than the entire county may be created subsequent to a general election in which a majority of the persons voting on the proposition adopt the proposition "to allow the division of ____________________ County into judicial districts composed of parts of ____________________ County." A redistricting plan may not be proposed or adopted by the legislature, the Judicial Districts Board, or the Legislative Redistricting Board in anticipation of a future action by the voters of any county.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.946. PROCEDURE. (a) The board shall meet in accordance with its own rules. The board shall meet at least once in each interim between regular sessions of the legislature and shall exercise its reapportionment powers only in the interims between regular legislative sessions. Meetings of the board shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 551, except as otherwise provided by this subchapter. A reapportionment may not be ordered in the interim immediately following a regular session of the legislature in which a valid and subsisting statewide reapportionment of judicial districts is enacted by the legislature. Unless the legislature enacts a statewide reapportionment of the judicial districts following each federal decennial census, the board shall convene not later than the first Monday of June of the third year following the year in which the federal decennial census is taken to make a statewide reapportionment of the districts. The board shall complete its work on the reapportionment and file its order with the secretary of state not later than August 31 of the same year. If the Judicial Districts Board fails to make a statewide apportionment by that date, the Legislative Redistricting Board established by Article III, Section 28, of the Texas Constitution shall make a statewide reapportionment of the judicial districts not later than the 150th day after the final day for the Judicial Districts Board to make the reapportionment, and that apportionment takes effect as provided by Sections 24.948 and 24.949.

(b) The board shall adopt its own rules of procedure and has the power to make investigations, hold hearings, compel by subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of records, administer oaths, and do all things necessary in its judgment to carry out its duties.

(c) On the request of the chairman, a peace officer shall serve a subpoena issued by the board. The officer shall serve the subpoena in the same manner as a subpoena issued by a district court is served. If the person to whom a subpoena is directed fails to comply, the board may bring suit in the district court to enforce the subpoena. If the court determines that good cause exists for the issuance of the subpoena, the court shall order compliance. The court may modify the requirements of a subpoena that the court determines are unreasonable. Failure to comply with the order of the district court is punishable as contempt.

(d) The board may provide for the compensation of subpoenaed witnesses. The amount of compensation may not exceed the amount paid to a witness subpoenaed by a district court in a civil proceeding.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(83), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 24.947. REAPPORTIONMENT ORDERS. Any judicial reapportionment order adopted by the board must be approved by a record vote of the majority of the membership of both the senate and house of representatives before the order can become effective and binding.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.948. EFFECT OF REAPPORTIONMENT. (a) After the effective date of a reapportionment order, the judicial districts affected by the order contain only the counties designated for the judicial districts in the reapportionment order, and the district courts shall have and exercise jurisdiction coextensive with the newly defined limits of the judicial districts in all actions, proceedings, matters, and causes of which district courts have jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of the state.

(b) If a county in which any part of the jurisdiction vested by general law in the county court has been transferred or made concurrent in a district court is removed by reapportionment under this subchapter from the judicial districts of all district courts having the county court jurisdiction, the board shall specify whether, after the effective date of the reapportionment order, the transferred county court jurisdiction is vested in the district court of the judicial districts in which the county is included under the reapportionment order or whether the transferred county court jurisdiction is revested in the county court.

(c) If the office of district attorney is authorized by law in or for a judicial district, a reapportionment under this subchapter does not change the county or counties included in the district for purposes of election, functions, duties, and authority of the district attorney, his assistants, and their successors in office.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.949. PENDING CASES AND PROCEEDINGS. (a) If a county is removed from a judicial district and placed or left in another judicial district by reapportionment under this subchapter, the district clerk of that county shall, on the effective date of the reapportionment order, transfer and properly docket to the court of a judicial district in which the county is located the cases and proceedings in that county on the docket of the court of the judicial district from which the county is removed, with all records, documents, and instruments on file in connection with the cases and proceedings. If a county is removed from a judicial district and placed or left in more than one judicial district, the clerk shall transfer the cases and proceedings to the district court of the judicial district for that county having the lowest numerical designation.

(b) If cases or other proceedings are transferred from a district court to another district court in accordance with this subchapter, all writs, processes, bonds, bail bonds, recognizances, complaints, informations and indictments, and any other matters returnable to the court from which the cases or proceedings were transferred are returnable to the court to which the cases or proceedings are transferred and are as valid as if they had been made returnable originally to that court.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.950. EQUALIZATION OF DOCKETS. The judges of the district courts may equalize their dockets in all counties in which there are two or more district courts. The judge of a district court, on motion of a party, on agreement of the parties, or on the judge's own motion, may transfer a cause or proceeding on the judge's docket to the docket of one of the other district courts.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.951. CONCURRENT JURISDICTION. If a county is located in two or more judicial districts by reapportionment under this subchapter, all the district courts in the county have concurrent civil and criminal jurisdiction within the territorial limits of the county.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.952. TERMS OF COURTS. The terms of the district court of a judicial district affected by reapportionment under this subchapter shall be the terms provided by the board in the reapportionment order affecting the judicial district. In the absence of a provision by the board, the terms of the district court, until otherwise prescribed by law, begin on the first Mondays in January and July of each year and continue until the time for convening the next regular term of the court. Each district court may hold as many sessions of court in each county each year as the judge considers expedient.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.953. OFFICERS OF COURT. In a county placed in a different or additional judicial district by reapportionment under this subchapter, the district clerk, sheriff, constables, county attorney, and district attorney or criminal district attorney of the county, and their assistants and successors in office, shall be the respective officers of all district courts of the county, including the courts of the different or additional judicial districts. Each officer shall perform all the duties and functions of his office relative to all the district courts of the county.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 24.954. QUARTERS FOR COURTS. The commissioners court of a county that is newly included in a judicial district by reapportionment under this subchapter shall provide suitable quarters, facilities, and personnel for the district court of the judicial district.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.19(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.